Ohio, session 136, SB382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 111.27, 3501.01, 3501.06, 3501.23, 3505.03, 3505.04, 3509.03, 3509.04, 3511.02, 3511.05, 3513.01, 3513.02, 3513.04, 3513.05, 3513.052, 3513.07, 3513.13, 3513.14, 3513.19, 3513.20, 3513.22, 3513.23, 3513.257, 3513.261, 3513.262, 3513.30, 3513.31, 3513.311, 3517.01, 3517.012, and 3517.03 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 111.27. There is hereby established in the state treasury the board of elections fund. The fund shall be used by the secretary of state to provide advancements, subject to recoupment, or to reimburse boards of elections pursuant to sections 3513.301, 3513.312, 3515.071, and 3521.03 of the Revised Code, and to provide training and educational programs for members and employees of boards of elections. The fund shall receive transfers of cash pursuant to controlling board action. Sec. 3501.01. As used in the sections of the Revised Code relating to elections and political communications: (A) "General election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in each November. (B) "Regular municipal election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year. (C) "Regular state election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each even-numbered year. (D) "Special election" means any election other than those elections defined in other divisions of this section. A special election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May or November, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August in accordance with section 3501.022 of the Revised Code, or on the day authorized by a particular municipal or county charter for the holding of a primary election, except that in any year in which a presidential primary election is held, no special election shall be held in May, except as authorized by a municipal or county charter, but may be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March. (E)(1) "Primary" or "primary election" means an election held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of political parties and as delegates and alternates to the conventions of political parties. Primary elections shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each year except in years in which a presidential primary election is held. (2) "Presidential primary election" means a primary election as defined by division (E)(1) of this section at which an election is held for the purpose of choosing delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the major political parties pursuant to section 3513.12 of the Revised Code. Unless otherwise specified, presidential primary elections are included in references to primary elections. In years in which a presidential primary election is held, all primary elections shall be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March except as otherwise authorized by a municipal or county charter. (F) "Political party" means any group of voters meeting the requirements set forth in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code for the formation and existence of a political party. (1) "Major political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state whose candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received not less than twenty per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. (2) "Minor political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state that meets either of the following requirements: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the political party's candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received less than twenty per cent but not less than three per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. A political party that meets the requirements of this division remains a political party for a period of four years after meeting those requirements. (b) The political party has filed with the secretary of state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a petition that meets the requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. A newly formed political party shall be known as a minor political party until the time of the first election for governor or president which occurs not less than twelve months subsequent to the formation of such party, after which election the status of such party shall be determined by the vote for the office of governor or president. (G) "Dominant party in a precinct" or "dominant political party in a precinct" means that political party whose candidate for election to the office of governor president at the most recent regular state election at which a governor president was elected received more votes than any other person received for election to that office in such precinct at such election. (H) "Candidate" means any qualified person certified in accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code for placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state, or any qualified person who claims to be a write-in candidate, or who knowingly assents to being represented as a write-in candidate by another at either a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state. (I) "Independent candidate" means any candidate who claims not to be affiliated with a political party, and whose name has been certified on the office-type ballot at a general or special election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and nominating petition, as prescribed in section 3513.257 of the Revised Code. (J) "Nonpartisan candidate" means any candidate whose name is required, pursuant to section 3505.04 of the Revised Code, to be listed on the nonpartisan ballot, including all candidates for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of any board of education, for municipal or township offices in which primary elections are not held for nominating candidates by political parties, and for offices of municipal corporations having charters that provide for separate ballots for elections for these offices. (K) "Party candidate" means any candidate who claims to be a member of a political party and who has been certified to appear on the office-type ballot at a general or special election as the nominee of a political party because the candidate has won the primary election of the candidate's party for the public office the candidate seeks, has been nominated under section 3517.012, or is selected by party committee in accordance with section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (L) "Officer of a political party" includes, but is not limited to, any member, elected or appointed, of a controlling committee, whether representing the territory of the state, a district therein, a county, township, a city, a ward, a precinct, or other territory, of a major or minor political party. (M) "Question or issue" means any question or issue certified in accordance with the Revised Code for placement on an official ballot at a general or special election to be held in this state. (N) "Elector" or "qualified elector" means a person having the qualifications provided by law to be entitled to vote. (O) "Voter" means an elector who votes at an election. (P) "Voting residence" means that place of residence of an elector which shall determine the precinct in which the elector may vote. (Q) "Precinct" means a district within a county established by the board of elections of such county within which all qualified electors having a voting residence therein may vote at the same polling place. (R) "Polling place" means that place provided for each precinct at which the electors having a voting residence in such precinct may vote. (S) "Board" or "board of elections" means the board of elections appointed in a county pursuant to section 3501.06 of the Revised Code. (T) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, city, village, or school district. (U) "Election officer" or "election official" means any of the following: (1) Secretary of state; (2) Employees of the secretary of state serving the division of elections in the capacity of attorney, administrative officer, administrative assistant, elections administrator, office manager, or clerical supervisor; (3) Director of a board of elections; (4) Deputy director of a board of elections; (5) Member of a board of elections; (6) Employees of a board of elections; (7) Precinct election officials; (8) Employees appointed by the boards of elections on a temporary or part-time basis. (V) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, informing a voter registration applicant or an applicant who wishes to change the applicant's residence or name of the status of the application; the information necessary to complete or update the application, if any; and if the application is complete, the precinct in which the applicant is to vote. (W) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, to a registered elector to confirm the registered elector's current address, date of birth, or United States citizenship, the number of the elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card, the last four digits of the elector's social security number, or any other information required for registration. The notice shall be sent by forwardable mail, shall be accompanied by a postage prepaid, preaddressed return envelope containing a form on which the elector may verify or correct the elector's registration, and shall meet the requirements of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. (X) "Designated agency" means an office or agency in the state that provides public assistance or that provides state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities and that is required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 to implement a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, or any other public or government office or agency that implements a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, including the department of job and family services, the program administered under section 3701.132 of the Revised Code by the department of health, the department of behavioral health, the department of developmental disabilities, the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, and any other agency the secretary of state designates. "Designated agency" does not include public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, or the office of a county treasurer. (Y) "National Voter Registration Act of 1993" means the "National Voter Registration Act of 1993," 107 Stat. 77, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973gg. (Z) "Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the "Voting Rights Act of 1965," 79 Stat. 437, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973, as amended. (AA)(1) "Photo identification" means one of the following documents that includes the individual's name and photograph and is not expired: (a) An Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued by the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code; (b) A United States passport or passport card; (c) A United States military identification card, Ohio national guard identification card, or United States department of veterans affairs identification card. (2) A "copy" of an individual's photo identification means images of both the front and back of a document described in division (AA)(1) of this section, except that if the document is a United States passport, a copy of the photo identification means an image of the passport's identification page that includes the individual's name, photograph, and other identifying information and the passport's expiration date. (BB) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code that authorizes an individual to drive. "Driver's license" includes a driver's license, commercial driver's license, probationary license, restricted license, motorcycle operator's license, or temporary instruction permit identification card. "Driver's license" does not include a limited term license issued under section 4506.14 or 4507.09 of the Revised Code. (CC) "State identification card" means a card issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. (DD) "Interim identification form" means the document issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar to an applicant for a driver's license or state identification card that contains all of the information otherwise found on the license or card and that an applicant may use as a form of identification until the physical license or card arrives in the mail. (EE)(1) "Proof of citizenship" means evidence that an individual is a United States citizen, in the form of one of the following: (a) The number of the individual's current Ohio driver's license or state identification card, if the secretary of state verifies using information obtained from the bureau of motor vehicles that the individual has submitted documentation to the bureau that indicates that the individual is a United States citizen; (b) The individual's current Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued on or after April 7, 2023, or a copy of the front and back of that license, card, or form, if the license, card, or form does not include a notation designating that the individual is a noncitizen of the United States; (c) The individual's birth certificate, certification of report of birth, or consular report of birth abroad, or a copy of one of those documents; (d) The individual's current United States passport or passport card, a copy of the identification page of the passport, or a copy of the front and back of the passport card; (e) The individual's certificate of naturalization or certificate of citizenship or a copy of one of those documents; (f) The individual's I-797 notice of action for form N-565, application for replacement naturalization/citizenship document issued by United States citizenship and immigration services, if the notice indicates that the application has been approved; a copy of that notice; or an original or copy of the successor form of that notice issued by the federal agency that is responsible for fulfilling requests for replacement naturalization or citizenship documents. (2) If an individual's current legal name is different from the name on the individual's proof of citizenship, the individual also shall provide proof of the change of name, such as a copy of a marriage license or court order. (FF) "Voter-nominated office" means a congressional or state elective office for which a candidate may choose to have the candidate's party preference or lack of party preference indicated upon the ballot. The following offices are voter-nominated offices: (1) Governor; (2) Lieutenant governor; (3) Secretary of state; (4) Treasurer of state; (5) Attorney general; (6) Member of the senate of the United States; (7) Member of the United States house of representatives; (8) Member of the Ohio senate; (9) Member of the Ohio house of representatives. (GG) "Nonpartisan office" means an elective office, except for a voter-nominated office, for which no party may nominate a candidate. The following offices are nonpartisan offices: (1) Judicial offices; (2) Member of a board of education; (3) County offices, except for elective offices within a political party as described in section 3517.03 of the Revised Code; (4) Municipal offices; (5) Township offices. (HH) "Partisan office" means an elective office to which candidates for election are nominated by party primary. (II) "Party primary" means a primary election held for the purpose of nominating political party candidates for election to any of the following offices: (1) President of the United States; (2) Vice president of the United States; (3) Delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the major political parties; (4) Elective offices within a political party. Sec. 3501.06. (A) There shall be in each county of the state a board of elections consisting of four qualified electors of the county, who shall be appointed by the secretary of state, as the secretary's representatives. (B)(1) On the first day of March in the years 2014 and 2016, the secretary of state shall appoint two of such board members for a term of three years. One of those board members shall be from the political party which cast the highest number of votes for the office of governor at the most recent regular state election, and the other shall be from the political party which cast the next highest number of votes for the office of governor at such election. (2) Beginning in 2017, on the first day of March in odd-numbered years, the secretary of state shall appoint two of such board members for a term of four years. One of those board members shall be from the political party which cast the highest number of votes in this state for the office of governor president at the most recent regular state election at which a person was elected to such office, and the other shall be from the political party which cast the next highest number of votes in this state for the office of governor president at such election. Thereafter, all appointments shall be made on the first day of March in odd-numbered years for a term of four years. (C) All vacancies filled for unexpired terms and all appointments to new terms shall be made from the political party to which the vacating or outgoing member belonged, unless there is a third political party which cast a greater number of votes in the state at the most recent regular state election for the office of governor president than did the party to which the retiring member belonged, in which event the vacancy shall be filled from such third party. Sec. 3501.23. A board of elections shall, by the adoption of a resolution, provide that, at any special election at which no candidates are to be elected, or at any primary election when only one party primary is to be held for the nomination of candidates for municipal office which is to be held in its county, the precinct officials at any such election shall consist of not more than four judges who shall perform all the duties prescribed for the proper conduct of an election by precinct officials. Such precinct officials shall be well qualified for the performance of their duties and said precinct officials for any special election shall be selected from among those regularly appointed under section 3501.22 of the Revised Code, but the precinct officials for any party primary election shall be selected from among those regularly appointed under such section, provided that such officials shall be equally divided between the two major political parties. Sec. 3505.03. (A) On the office type ballotballots shall be printed the names of all candidates for election to offices, except the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, who were nominated at the most recent primary election as candidates of a political party or who were nominated in accordance with section 3513.02 of the Revised Code, and the names of all candidates for election to offices who were nominated by nominating petitions, except candidates for the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of a board of education, for municipal offices, and for township offices. (B) The face of the ballot below the stub shall be substantially in the following form: "OFFICIAL OFFICE TYPE BALLOT (1) To vote for a candidate record your vote in the manner provided next to the name of such candidate. (2) If you tear, soil, deface, or erroneously mark this ballot, return it to the precinct election officers or, if you cannot return it, notify the precinct election officers, and obtain another ballot." (C) The order in which the offices shall be listed on the ballot shall be prescribed by, and certified to each board of elections by, the secretary of state; provided that for state, district, and county offices the order from top to bottom shall be as follows: governor and lieutenant governor, attorney general, auditor of state, secretary of state, treasurer of state, chief justice of the supreme court, justice of the supreme court, United States senator, representative to congress, state senator, and state representative, judge of a court of appeals, county commissioner, county auditor, prosecuting attorney, clerk of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county treasurer, county engineer, and coroner. The offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be printed on the ballot in a manner that requires a voter to cast one vote jointly for the candidates who have been nominated by the same political party or petitiontogether by petition or in the preceding primary election. (D) Within the rectangular space within which the title of each judicial office listed in division (C) of this section is printed on the ballot and immediately below the title shall be printed the date of the commencement of the term of the office, if it is a full term, as follows: "Full term commencing _______(Date)_______," or the date of the end of the term of the office, if it is an unexpired term, as follows: "Unexpired term ending _______(Date)________" (E)(1)(D)(1) The names of all candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office, and, except for absentee ballots or when the number of candidates for a particular office is the same as the number of candidates to be elected for that office, shall be rotated from one precinct to another. On absentee ballots, the names of all candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office and shall be so alternated that each name shall appear, insofar as may be reasonably possible, substantially an equal number of times at the beginning, at the end, and in each intermediate place, if any, of the group in which such name belongs, unless the number of candidates for a particular office is the same as the number of candidates to be elected for that office. (2) The method of printing the ballots to meet the rotation requirement of this section shall be as follows: the least common multiple of the number of names in each of the several groups of candidates shall be used, and the number of changes made in the printer's forms in printing the ballots shall correspond with that multiple. The board of elections shall number all precincts in regular serial sequence. In the first precinct, the names of the candidates in each group shall be listed in alphabetical order. In each succeeding precinct, the name in each group that is listed first in the preceding precinct shall be listed last, and the name of each candidate shall be moved up one place. In each precinct using paper ballots, the printed ballots shall then be assembled in tablets. (F)(E) Under the name of each candidate nominated at a party primary election, nominated by petition under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, or certified by a party committee to fill a vacancy under section 3513.31 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the name of the political party by which the candidate was nominated or certified. Under the name of each candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested a ballot designation as a nonparty candidate under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the designation of "nonparty candidate." Under the name of each candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested a ballot designation as an other-party candidate under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the designation of "other-party candidate." No designation shall appear under the name of a candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested that no ballot designation appear under the candidate's name under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code, or who filed a nominating petition and failed to request a ballot designation either as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate under that section. (G)(F) Under the name of each candidate nominated by primary election held for the purpose of nominating candidates for election to a voter-nominated office, or by nominating petition for election to such office, shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the name of the political party declared as that candidate's preferred party in the candidate's declaration of candidacy, or "No political party preference" if that candidate declared a preference for no political party in the candidate's declaration of candidacy. (G) Except as provided in this section, no words, designations, or emblems descriptive of a candidate or the candidate's political affiliation, or indicative of the method by which the candidate was nominated or certified, shall be printed under or after a candidate's name that is printed on the ballot. Sec. 3505.04. On the nonpartisan ballot shall be printed the names of all nonpartisan candidates for election to the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, the office of member of a board of education, municipal or township offices for municipal corporations and townships in which primary elections are not held for nomination of candidates by political parties, and municipal offices of municipal corporations having charters which provide for separate ballots for elections for such municipal officesnonpartisan offices. Such ballots shall have printed across the top, and below the stubs, "Official Nonpartisan Ballot." The order in which the offices are listed on the ballot shall be prescribed by, and certified to each board of elections by, the secretary of state; provided that county judicial offices shall be listed first on the ballot, followed by municipal and township offices, and by offices of member of a board of education, in the order stated. Within the rectangular space within which the title of each judicial office is printed on the ballot and immediately below such title shall be printed the date of the commencement of the term of the office, if a full term, as follows: "Full term commencing _______(Date)_______," or the date of the end of the term of the office, if an unexpired term, as follows: "Unexpired term ending _______(Date)________" Within the rectangular space within which the title of each office for member of a board of education is printed on the ballot shall be printed "For Member of Board of Education," and the number to be elected, directions to the voter as to voting for one, two, or more, and, if the office to be voted for is member of a board of education of a city school district, words shall be printed in said space on the ballot to indicate whether candidates are to be elected from subdistricts or at large. The names of all nonpartisan candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office, and shall be rotated and printed on the ballot as provided in section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. No name or designation of any political party nor any words, designations, or emblems descriptive of a candidate or the candidate's political affiliation, or indicative of the method by which such candidate was nominated or certified, shall be printed under or after any nonpartisan candidate's name which is printed on the ballot. Sec. 3509.03. (A) Except as otherwise provided in sections 3509.051, 3511.02, and 3511.021 of the Revised Code, any qualified elector desiring to vote absent voter's ballots at an election shall deliver a written application for those ballots, either in person or by mail, to the board of elections of the county in which the elector's voting residence is located. (B) Except as otherwise permitted under section 3511.02 of the Revised Code and under division (C) of this section, the application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall contain all of the following: (1) The elector's name; (2) The elector's signature; (3) The address at which the elector is registered to vote; (4) The elector's date of birth; (5) One of the following: (a) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number; (b) The last four digits of the elector's social security number; (c) A copy of the elector's photo identification. (6) A statement identifying the election for which absent voter's ballots are requested; (7) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is a qualified elector; (8) If the request is for party primary election ballots, the elector's party affiliation; (9) If the elector desires ballots to be mailed to the elector, the address to which those ballots shall be mailed. (C) If the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the elector may provide the elector's program participant identification number instead of the address at which the elector is registered to vote. (D) Except as otherwise provided in division (A) of section 3509.051 and in division (B) of section 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an application to receive absent voter's ballots shall be delivered to the office of the board not earlier than the first day of January of the year of the elections for which the absent voter's ballots are requested or not earlier than ninety days before the day of the election at which the ballots are to be voted, whichever is earlier, and not later than the close of business on the seventh day before the day of the election at which the ballots are to be voted. (E) Except as permitted under section 111.31 of the Revised Code, no public office, and no public official or employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall do either of the following: (1) Prepay the return postage for an application for absent voter's ballots; (2) Mail or otherwise deliver an unsolicited application for absent voter's ballots to any person. (F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(2) of this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, no person shall preprint or fill out any portion of an application for absent voter's ballots on behalf of an applicant. (2) The secretary of state or a board of elections may preprint only an applicant's name and address on an application for absent voter's ballots before mailing that application to the applicant, except that if the applicant has a confidential voter registration record, the secretary of state or a board of elections shall not preprint the applicant's address on the application. (3) A completed application for absent voter's ballots is not valid if any portion of it has been completed by any person other than the applicant in violation of division (F) of this section. Sec. 3509.04. (A) If a board of elections receives an application for absent voter's ballots that does not contain all of the required information or is not submitted on an appropriate form, the board promptly shall notify the applicant of the additional information required to be provided by the applicant to complete that application, direct the applicant to use an appropriate form, or both, as applicable. (B) Upon receipt by the board of elections of an application for absent voter's ballots that contains all of the required information and is submitted on an appropriate form, as provided by section 3509.03 and division (G) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code, the board, if the board finds that the applicant is a qualified elector, shall deliver to the applicant in person or mail directly to the applicant by special delivery mail, air mail, or regular mail, postage prepaid, proper absent voter's ballots. The board shall deliver or mail with the ballots an unsealed identification envelope upon the face of which shall be printed a form substantially as follows: "Identification Envelope Statement of Voter I, ________________________(Name of voter), declare under penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. My voting residence in Ohio is ________________________________________________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) Ohio, which is in Ward _____________ Precinct ________________ in that city, village, or township. If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am providing my program participant identification number instead of my residence address: ________________________ The party primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope are primary election ballots of the _____________ Party. Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be held on the __________________________ day of ______________________, ____. My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), __________ (Year). (Voter must provide one of the following:) My Ohio driver's license or state identification card number is _______________ (Driver's license or state identification card number). The last four digits of my Social Security Number are _______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). ______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state identification card number or the last four digits of my Social Security Number, I am enclosing a copy of my photo identification in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. _________________________ (Signature of Voter) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The board shall mail with the ballots and the unsealed identification envelope an unsealed return envelope upon the face of which shall be printed the post-office address of the board. In the upper left corner on the face of the return envelope, several blank lines shall be printed upon which the voter may write the voter's name and return address. The return envelope shall be of such size that the identification envelope can be conveniently placed within it for returning the identification envelope to the board. No public office, and no public official or employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall prepay the return postage for any absent voter's ballots. Except as otherwise provided in this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election official shall not fill out any portion of an identification envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an elector's name and address on an identification envelope statement of voter before mailing absent voter's ballots to the elector, except that if the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the board of elections shall not preprint the elector's address on the identification envelope statement of voter. Sec. 3511.02. (A) Notwithstanding any section of the Revised Code to the contrary, whenever any person applies for registration as a voter on a form adopted in accordance with federal regulations relating to the "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act," 100 Stat. 924, 52 U.S.C.A. 20301, this application shall be sufficient for voter registration and as a request for an absent voter's ballot. Uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots may be obtained by any person meeting the requirements of section 3511.011 of the Revised Code by applying electronically to the secretary of state or to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located in accordance with section 3511.021 of the Revised Code or by applying to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located, in one of the following ways: (1) That person may make written application for those ballots. The person may personally deliver the application to the office of the board or may mail it, send it by facsimile machine, send it by electronic mail, send it through internet delivery if such delivery is offered by the board of elections or the secretary of state, or otherwise send it to the board. Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, the application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall contain all of the following information: (a) The elector's name; (b) The elector's signature; (c) The address at which the elector is registered to vote; (d) The elector's date of birth; (e) One of the following: (i) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number; (ii) The last four digits of the elector's social security number; (iii) A copy of the elector's photo identification. (f) A statement identifying the election for which absent voter's ballots are requested; (g) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is a qualified elector; (h) A statement that the elector is an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter as defined in 52 U.S.C. 20310; (i) A statement of the elector's length of residence in the state immediately preceding the commencement of service, immediately preceding the date of leaving to be with or near the service member, or immediately preceding leaving the United States, or a statement that the elector's parent or legal guardian resided in this state long enough to establish residency for voting purposes immediately preceding leaving the United States, whichever is applicable; (j) If the request is for party primary election ballots, the elector's party affiliation; (k) If the elector desires ballots to be mailed to the elector, the address to which those ballots shall be mailed; (l) If the elector desires ballots to be sent to the elector by facsimile machine, the telephone number to which they shall be so sent; (m) If the elector desires ballots to be sent to the elector by electronic mail or, if offered by the board of elections or the secretary of state, through internet delivery, the elector's electronic mail address or other internet contact information. (2) A voter or any relative of a voter listed in division (A)(3) of this section may use a single federal post card application to apply for uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots for use at the primary and general elections in a given year and any special election to be held on the day in that year specified by division (E) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code for the holding of a primary election, designated by the general assembly for the purpose of submitting constitutional amendments proposed by the general assembly to the voters of the state. A single federal postcard application shall be processed by the board of elections pursuant to section 3511.04 of the Revised Code the same as if the voter had applied separately for uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots for each election. (3) Application to have uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots mailed or sent by facsimile machine to such a person may be made by the spouse, father, mother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, grandfather, grandmother, brother or sister of the whole blood or half blood, son, daughter, adopting parent, adopted child, stepparent, stepchild, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece of such a person. The application shall be in writing upon a blank form furnished only by the board or on a single federal post card as provided in division (A)(2) of this section. The form of the application shall be prescribed by the secretary of state. The board shall furnish that blank form to any of the relatives specified in this division desiring to make the application, only upon the request of such a relative made in person at the office of the board or upon the written request of such a relative mailed to the office of the board. Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, the application, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant, shall contain all of the following: (a) The full name of the elector for whom ballots are requested; (b) A statement that the elector is an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter as defined in 52 U.S.C. 20310; (c) The address at which the elector is registered to vote; (d) A statement identifying the elector's length of residence in the state immediately preceding the commencement of service, immediately preceding the date of leaving to be with or near a service member, or immediately preceding leaving the United States, or a statement that the elector's parent or legal guardian resided in this state long enough to establish residency for voting purposes immediately preceding leaving the United States, as the case may be; (e) The elector's date of birth; (f) One of the following: (i) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number; (ii) The last four digits of the elector's social security number; (iii) A copy of the elector's photo identification. (g) A statement identifying the election for which absent voter's ballots are requested; (h) A statement that the person requesting the ballots is a qualified elector; (i) If the request is for party primary election ballots, the elector's party affiliation; (j) A statement that the applicant bears a relationship to the elector as specified in division (A)(3) of this section; (k) The address to which ballots shall be mailed, the telephone number to which ballots shall be sent by facsimile machine, the electronic mail address to which ballots shall be sent by electronic mail, or, if internet delivery is offered by the board of elections or the secretary of state, the internet contact information to which ballots shall be sent through internet delivery; (l) The signature and address of the person making the application. (B) If the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the application may include the elector's program participant identification number instead of the address at which the elector is registered to vote. (C) Each application for uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots shall be delivered to the office of the board not earlier than the first day of January of the year of the elections for which the uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots are requested or not earlier than ninety days before the day of the election at which the ballots are to be voted, whichever is earlier. An application to receive uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots by mail or by another method permitted under section 3511.021 of the Revised Code shall be delivered to the office of the board not later than the close of business on the seventh day preceding the day of the election. (D) If the voter for whom the application is made is entitled to vote for presidential and vice-presidential electors only, the applicant shall submit to the board, in addition to the requirements of division (A) of this section, a statement to the effect that the voter is qualified to vote for presidential and vice-presidential electors and for no other offices. (E) Except as permitted under section 111.31 of the Revised Code, no public office, and no public official or employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall do either of the following: (1) Prepay the return postage for an application for absent voter's ballots; (2) Mail or otherwise deliver an unsolicited application for absent voter's ballots to any person. (F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (A)(2) and (3) and (F)(2) of this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, no person shall fill out any portion of a federal post card application or other application for absent voter's ballots on behalf of an applicant. (2) The secretary of state or a board of elections may preprint only an applicant's name and address on a federal post card application or other application for absent voter's ballots before mailing that application to the applicant, except that if the applicant has a confidential voter registration record, the secretary of state or the board of elections shall not preprint the applicant's address on the application. (3) A completed application for absent voter's ballots is not valid if any portion of it has been completed by any person other than the applicant in violation of division (F) of this section. Sec. 3511.05. (A) The board of elections shall place uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots sent by mail in an unsealed identification envelope, gummed ready for sealing. The board shall include with uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots sent electronically, including by facsimile machine, an instruction sheet for preparing a gummed envelope in which the ballots shall be returned. The envelope for returning ballots sent by either means shall have printed or written on its face a form substantially as follows: "Identification Envelope Statement of Voter I, ________________________(Name of voter), declare under penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. My voting residence in Ohio is ________________________________________________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) Ohio, which is in Ward _______________ Precinct ________________ in that city, village, or township. If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am providing my program participant identification number instead of my residence address: ________________________ The party primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope are primary election ballots of the _____________ Party. Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be held on the __________________________ day of ______________________, ____ My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), __________ (Year). (Voter must provide one of the following:) My Ohio driver's license or state identification card number is _______________ (Driver's license or state identification card number). The last four digits of my Social Security Number are _______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). ______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state identification card number or the last four digits of my Social Security Number, I am enclosing a copy of my photo identification in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. ________________________ (Signature of Voter) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." (B) The board shall also mail with the ballots and the unsealed identification envelope sent by mail an unsealed return envelope, gummed, ready for sealing, for use by the voter in returning the voter's marked ballots to the office of the board. The board shall send with the ballots and the instruction sheet for preparing a gummed envelope sent electronically, including by facsimile machine, an instruction sheet for preparing a second gummed envelope as described in this division, for use by the voter in returning that voter's marked ballots to the board. The return envelope shall have two parallel lines, each one quarter of an inch in width, printed across its face paralleling the top, with an intervening space of one quarter of an inch between such lines. The top line shall be one and one-quarter inches from the top of the envelope. Between the parallel lines shall be printed: "OFFICIAL ELECTION UNIFORMED SERVICES OR OVERSEAS ABSENT VOTER'S BALLOTS -- VIA AIR MAIL." Three blank lines shall be printed in the upper left corner on the face of the envelope for the use by the voter in placing the voter's complete military, naval, or mailing address on these lines. The post-office address of the office of the board shall be printed on the face of such envelope in the lower right portion below the bottom parallel line. (C) On the back of each identification envelope and each return envelope shall be printed the following: "Instructions to voter: If the flap on this envelope is so firmly stuck to the back of the envelope when received by you as to require forcible opening in order to use it, open the envelope in the manner least injurious to it, and, after marking your ballots and enclosing same in the envelope for mailing them to the board of elections, reclose the envelope in the most practicable way, by sealing or otherwise, and sign the blank form printed below. The flap on this envelope was firmly stuck to the back of the envelope when received, and required forced opening before sealing and mailing. ____________________ (Signature of voter)" (D) Division (C) of this section does not apply when absent voter's ballots are sent electronically, including by facsimile machine. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election official shall not fill out any portion of an identification envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an elector's name and address on an identification envelope statement of voter before mailing or electronically transmitting absent voter's ballots to the elector, except that if the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the board of elections shall not preprint the elector's address on the identification envelope statement of voter. Sec. 3513.01. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, primary elections shall be held as provided in division (E) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of political parties for election to offices to be voted for at the succeeding general electionfollows: (1) A primary election held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates for election to a voter-nominated office shall be conducted as follows: (a) All candidates for an office shall be listed on a single primary ballot, and a voter may vote for any candidate, regardless of the candidate's or voter's affiliation or membership with a political party, provided that the elector is otherwise qualified to vote for candidates for that office. (b) The candidates receiving the highest and second highest number of votes shall advance to the succeeding general election. If more than one candidate is to be elected to an office, or if multiple offices of the same type are to be filled by the same slate of candidates, the number of candidates advancing to the general election shall be twice the number to be elected. (c) A candidate shall have the candidate's political party preference, or lack of political party preference, indicated on the ballot for an office in the manner described under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Selection of a party preference by a candidate does not constitute or imply endorsement of the candidate by the party designated. No candidate for an office shall be deemed the official candidate of any party by virtue of the candidate's selection in the primary election. (d) A political party or party central committee does not have the right to have its preferred candidate participate in the general election other than as chosen by voters in the primary. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit a political party or party central committee from endorsing, supporting, or opposing any candidate. (2) A primary election held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates for election to a nonpartisan office shall be conducted in the manner described under division (A)(1) of this section, except that a candidate shall not have the candidate's political party preference, or lack of political party preference, indicated on the ballot. (3) Presidential primary elections shall be held as provided in division (E)(2) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The manner of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of a municipal corporation having a population of two thousand or more, as ascertained by the most recent federal census, shall be the same as the manner in which candidates were nominated for election as officers in the municipal corporation in 1989 unless the manner of nominating such candidates is changed under division (C), (D), or (E) of this section. (C) Primary elections shall not be held for the nomination of candidates for election as officers of any township, or any municipal corporation having a population of less than two thousand, unless a majority of the electors of any such township or municipal corporation, as determined by the total number of votes cast in such township or municipal corporation for the office of governor at the most recent regular state election, files with the board of elections of the county within which such township or municipal corporation is located, or within which the major portion of the population thereof is located, if the municipal corporation is situated in more than one county, not later than one hundred twenty days before the day of a primary election, a petition signed by such electors asking that candidates for election as officers of such township or municipal corporation be nominated by primary election as candidates of political parties, in which event primary elections shall be held in such township or municipal corporation for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of political parties for election as officers of such township or municipal corporation to be voted for at the succeeding regular municipal election. In a township or municipal corporation where a majority of the electors have filed a petition asking that candidates for election as officers of the township or municipal corporation be nominated by primary election as candidates of political parties, the nomination of candidates for a nonpartisan election by nominating petition may be reestablished in the manner prescribed in division (E)(D) of this section. (D)(1)(C)(1) The electors in a municipal corporation having a population of two thousand or more, in which municipal officers were nominated in the most recent election by nominating petition and elected by nonpartisan election, may place on the ballot in the manner prescribed in division (D)(2)(C)(2) of this section the question of changing to the primary-election method of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of the municipal corporation. (2) The board of elections of the county within which the municipal corporation is located, or, if the municipal corporation is located in more than one county, of the county within which the major portion of the population of the municipal corporation is located, shall, upon receipt of a petition signed by electors of the municipal corporation equal in number to at least ten per cent of the vote cast at the most recent regular municipal election, submit to the electors of the municipal corporation the question of changing to the primary-election method of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of the municipal corporation. The ballot language shall be substantially as follows: "Shall candidates for election as officers of ____________ (name of municipal corporation) in the county of ____________ (name of county) be nominated as candidates of political partiesby primary election? ________ yes ________ no" The question shall be placed on the ballot at the next general election in an even-numbered year occurring at least ninety days after the petition is filed with the board. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote in the affirmative, candidates for election as officers of the municipal corporation shall thereafter be nominated as candidates of political parties in primary elections, under division (A) of this section, unless a change in the manner of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of the municipal corporation is made under division (E)(D) of this section. (E)(1)(D)(1) The electors in a township or municipal corporation in which the township or municipal officers are nominated as candidates of political parties in a primary election may place on the ballot, in the manner prescribed in division (E)(2)(D)(2) of this section, the question of changing to the nonpartisan method of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of the township or municipal corporation. (2) The board of elections of the county within which the township or municipal corporation is located, or, if the municipal corporation is located in more than one county, of the county within which the major portion of the population of the municipal corporation is located, shall, upon receipt of a petition signed by electors of the township or municipal corporation equal in number to at least ten per cent of the vote cast at the most recent regular township or municipal election, as appropriate, submit to the electors of the township or municipal corporation, as appropriate, the question of changing to the nonpartisan nominating petition method of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of the township or municipal corporation. The ballot language shall be substantially as follows: "Shall candidates for election as officers of ____________ (name of the township or municipal corporation) in the county of ____________ (name of county) be nominated as candidates by nominating petition and be elected only in a nonpartisan election? ________ yes ________ no" The question shall appear on the ballot at the next general election in an even-numbered year occurring at least ninety days after the petition is filed with the board. If a majority of electors voting on the question vote in the affirmative, candidates for officer of the township or municipal corporation shall thereafter be nominated by nominating petition and be elected only in a nonpartisan election, unless a change in the manner of nominating persons as candidates for election as officers of the township or municipal corporation is made under division (C)(B) or (D)(C) of this section. Sec. 3513.02. If, in any odd-numbered year, no valid declaration of candidacy is filed for nomination as a candidate of a political party for election to any of the offices to be voted for at the general election to be held in such year, or if the number of persons filing such declarations of candidacy for nominations as candidates of one political party for election to such partisan offices does not exceed, as to any such office, the number of candidates which such political party is entitled to nominate as its candidates for election to such office, then no primary election shall be held for the purpose of nominating party candidates of such party for election to offices to be voted for at such general election and no primary ballots shall be provided for such party. If, however, the only office for which there are more valid declarations of candidacy filed than the number to be nominated by a political party, is the office of councilperson in a ward, a primary election shall be held for such party only in the ward or wards in which there is a contest, and only the names of the candidates for the office of councilperson in such ward shall appear on the primary ballot of such political party. The election officials whose duty it would have been to provide for and conduct the holding of such primary election, declare the results thereof, and issue certificates of nomination to the persons entitled thereto if such primary election had been held shall declare each of such persons to be nominated as of the date of the ninetieth day before the primary election, issue appropriate certificates of nomination to each of them, and certify their names to the proper election officials, in order that their names may be printed on the official ballots provided for use in the succeeding general election in the same manner as though such primary election had been held and such persons had been nominated at such election. Sec. 3513.04. Candidates for party nominations to state, district, county, and municipal offices or positions, for which party nominations are provided by law, and for election as members of party controlling committees, shall have their names printed on the official primary ballot by filing a declaration of candidacy and paying the fees specified for the office under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code, except that the joint candidates for party nomination to the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall, for the two of them, file one declaration of candidacy. The joint candidates also shall pay the fees specified for the joint candidates under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall not accept for filing the declaration of candidacy of a candidate for party nomination to the office of governor unless the declaration of candidacy also shows a joint candidate for the same party's nomination to the office of lieutenant governor, shall not accept for filing the declaration of candidacy of a candidate for party nomination to the office of lieutenant governor unless the declaration of candidacy also shows a joint candidate for the same party's nomination to the office of governor, and shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy that shows a candidate for party nomination to the office of governor or lieutenant governor who, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any other state office or any federal or county office. No person who seeks party nomination for an office or position at a primary election by declaration of candidacy or by declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate and no person who is a first choice for president of candidates seeking election as delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the different major political parties who are chosen by direct vote of the electors as provided in this chapter shall be permitted to become a candidate by nominating petition, including a nominating petition filed under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, by declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or by filling a vacancy under section 3513.31 of the Revised Code at the following general election for any office other than the office of member of the state board of education, office of member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, office of member of a governing board of an educational service center, or office of township trustee. Sec. 3513.05. Each person desiring to become a candidate for a party nomination at a primary election or for election to an office or position to be voted for at a primary election, except persons desiring to become joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor and except as otherwise provided in section 3513.051 of the Revised Code, shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election, file a declaration of candidacy and petition and pay the fees required under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. The declaration of candidacy and all separate petition papers shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. When the offices are to be voted for at a primary election, persons desiring to become joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election, comply with section 3513.04 of the Revised Code. The prospective joint candidates' declaration of candidacy and all separate petition papers of candidacies shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy and petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of candidacy is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, if the declaration of candidacy is for a municipal or township office. If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy which is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, the petition, including a petition for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by at least one thousand qualified electors who are members of the same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and the declaration of candidacy and petition shall be filed with the secretary of state; provided that the secretary of state shall not accept or file any such petition appearing on its face to contain signatures of more than three thousand electors. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, if the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors within a district, political subdivision, or portion thereof, the petition shall be signed by not less than fifty qualified electors who are members of the same political party as the political party of which the candidate is a member. If the declaration of candidacy is for party nomination as a candidate for member of the legislative authority of a municipal corporation elected by ward, the petition shall be signed by not less than twenty-five qualified electors who are members of the political party of which the candidate is a member. No such petition, except the petition for a candidacy that is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, shall be accepted for filing if it appears to contain on its face signatures of more than three times the minimum number of signatures. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures accepted exceeds three times the minimum number of signatures required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying signatures on petitions when the number of verified signatures equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy for party nomination or for election as a candidate of a minor party, the minimum number of signatures on such petition is one-half the minimum number provided in this section, except that, when the candidacy is one for election as a member of the state central committee or the county central committee of a political party, the minimum number shall be the same for a minor party as for a major party. If a declaration of candidacy is one for election as a member of the state central committee or the county central committee of a political party, the petition shall be signed by five qualified electors of the district, county, ward, township, or precinct within which electors may vote for such candidate. The electors signing such petition shall be members of the same political party as the political party of which the candidate is a member. For purposes of signing or circulating a petition of candidacy for party nomination or election, an elector is considered to be a member of a political party if the elector voted in that party's primary election within the preceding two calendar years, or if the elector did not vote in any other party's primary election within the preceding two calendar years. If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors within a county, or within a district or subdivision or part thereof smaller than a county, the petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county. If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors of a district or subdivision or part thereof that is situated in more than one county, the petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county within which the major portion of the population thereof, as ascertained by the next preceding federal census, is located. A petition shall consist of separate petition papers, each of which shall contain signatures of electors of only one county. Petitions or separate petition papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county shall not thereby be declared invalid. In case petitions or separate petition papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county are filed, the board shall determine the county from which the majority of signatures came, and only signatures from such county shall be counted. Signatures from any other county shall be invalid. Each separate petition paper shall be circulated by one person only, who shall be the candidate or a joint candidate or a member of the same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and each separate petition paper shall be governed by the rules set forth in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each board such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with the secretary of state as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of such board. The board of the most populous county of a district shall promptly transmit to each board within such district such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of each such board. The board of a county within which the major portion of the population of a subdivision, situated in more than one county, is located, shall promptly transmit to the board of each other county within which a portion of such subdivision is located such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport to contain signatures of electors of the portion of such subdivision in the county of each such board. All petition papers so transmitted to a board and all petitions accompanying declarations of candidacy filed with a board shall, under proper regulations, be open to public inspection until four p.m. of the eightieth day before the day of the next primary election. Each board shall, not later than the seventy-eighth day before the day of that primary election, examine and determine the validity or invalidity of the signatures on the petition papers so transmitted to or filed with it and shall return to the secretary of state all petition papers transmitted to it by the secretary of state, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of signatures thereon, and shall return to each other board all petition papers transmitted to it by such board, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of the signatures thereon. All other matters affecting the validity or invalidity of such petition papers shall be determined by the secretary of state or the board with whom such petition papers were filed. Protests against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy for party nomination or for election to an a partisan office or position, as provided in this section, may be filed by any qualified elector who is a member of the same political party as the candidate and who is eligible to vote at the primary election for the candidate whose declaration of candidacy the elector objects to, or by the controlling committee of that political party. Protests against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy for nomination or for election to a voter-nominated or nonpartisan office may be filed by any qualified elector who is eligible to vote at the primary election for the candidate whose declaration of candidacy the elector objects to. The protest shall be in writing, and shall be filed not later than four p.m. of the seventy-fourth day before the day of the primary election. The protest shall be filed with the election officials with whom the declaration of candidacy and petition was filed. Upon the filing of the protest, the election officials with whom it is filed shall promptly fix the time for hearing it, and shall forthwith mail notice of the filing of the protest and the time fixed for hearing to the person whose candidacy is so protested. They shall also forthwith mail notice of the time fixed for such hearing to the person who filed the protest. At the time fixed, such election officials shall hear the protest and determine the validity or invalidity of the declaration of candidacy and petition. If they find that such candidate is not an elector of the state, district, county, or political subdivision in which the candidate seeks a party nomination or election to an office or position, or has not fully complied with this chapter, the candidate's declaration of candidacy and petition shall be determined to be invalid and shall be rejected; otherwise, it shall be determined to be valid. That determination shall be final. A protest against the candidacy of any persons filing a declaration of candidacy for joint party nomination to the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be filed, heard, and determined in the same manner as a protest against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy singly. The secretary of state shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to each board in the state the forms of the official ballots to be used at the primary election, together with the names of the candidates to be printed on the ballots whose nomination or election is to be determined by electors throughout the entire state and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. The board of the most populous county in a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county in the district the names of the candidates to be printed on the official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose nomination or election is to be determined only by electors within the district and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. The board of a county within which the major portion of the population of a subdivision smaller than the county and situated in more than one county is located shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county in which a portion of that subdivision is located the names of the candidates to be printed on the official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose nomination or election is to be determined only by electors within that subdivision and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. Sec. 3513.052. (A) No person shall seek nomination or election to any of the following offices or positions at the same election by filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or by becoming a candidate through party nomination in a primary election, or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code: (1) Two or more state offices; (2) Two or more county offices; (3) A state office and a county office; (4) A federal office and a state or county office; (5) Any combination of two or more municipal or township offices, positions as a member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or positions as a member of a governing board of an educational service center. (B) The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code for: (1) Any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition is for a state or county office; (2) Any municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. (C)(1) If the secretary of state determines, before the day of the primary election, that a person is seeking nomination to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and none of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the board determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the secretary of state shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the secretary of state determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (2) If a board of elections determines, before the day of the primary election, that a person is seeking nomination to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the board shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within that county and none of those offices is a federal office, the board shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the board determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state then shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the secretary of state determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state then shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (D)(1) If the secretary of state determines, after the day of the primary election and before the day of the general election, that a person is seeking election to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within a single county and none of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the secretary of state shall promptly investigate and determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (2) If a board of elections determines, after the day of the primary election and before the day of the general election, that a person is seeking election to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the board of elections shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within that county and none of those offices is a federal office, the board shall determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state promptly shall investigate and determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within that county and any of those offices is a federal office, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (E) When a person is disqualified as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section, on or before the seventieth day before the day of the applicable election, the board of elections shall remove the person's name from the ballot for any office for which that person has been disqualified as a candidate according to the directions of the secretary of state. When a person is disqualified as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section after the seventieth day before the day of the applicable election, the board of elections shall not remove the person's name from the ballot for any office for which that person has been disqualified as a candidate. The board of elections shall post a notice at each polling location on the day of the applicable election, and shall enclose with each absent voter's ballot given or mailed after the candidate is disqualified, a notice that votes for the person for the office for which the person has been disqualified as a candidate will be void and will not be counted. If the name is not removed from the ballots before the day of the election, the votes for the disqualified candidate are void and shall not be counted. (F) Any vacancy created by the disqualification of a person as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section may be filled in the manner provided for in sections 3513.30 and 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (G) Nothing in this section or section 3513.04, 3513.041, 3513.05, 3513.251, 3513.253, 3513.254, 3513.255, 3513.257, or 3513.261 of the Revised Code prohibits, and the secretary of state or a board of elections shall not disqualify, a person from being a candidate for an office, if that person timely withdraws as a candidate for any offices specified in division (A) of this section for which that person first sought to become a candidate by filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, by party nomination in a primary election, or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (H) As used in this section: (1) "State office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) "Timely withdraws" means either of the following: (a) Withdrawing as a candidate before the applicable deadline for filing a declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition for the subsequent office for which the person is seeking to become a candidate at the same election; (b) Withdrawing as a candidate before the applicable deadline for the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, if the person is seeking to become a candidate for a subsequent office at the same election under either of those sections. Sec. 3513.07. (A) The form of declaration of candidacy and petition of a person desiring to be a candidate for a party nomination or a candidate for election to an a partisan office or position to be voted for at a primary election shall be substantially as follows: "DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY PARTY PRIMARY ELECTION I, ___________________________ (Name of Candidate), the undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election falsification that my voting residence is in _______________ precinct of the _____________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City or Village) in the county of ________________, Ohio; that my voting residence is _______________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the _____________________________ (City or Village) of _________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector in the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I am a member of the ________ Party. I hereby declare that I desire to be ____________________ (a candidate for nomination as a candidate of the Party for election to the office of _____________) (a candidate for election to the office or position of ______________) for the ____________ in the state, district, (Full term or unexpired term ending _______________) county, city, or village of ___________________, at the primary election to be held on the _____________ day of _________, ____, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official primary election ballot of the said __________ Party as a candidate for _________ (such nomination) or (such election) as provided by law. I further declare that, if elected to said office or position, I will qualify therefor, and that I will support and abide by the principles enunciated by the ____________ Party. Dated this __________ day of _________________, _________ __________________________________ (Signature of candidate) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. PETITION OF CANDIDATE We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of Ohio, whose voting residence is in the county, city, village, ward, township, or school district, and precinct set opposite our names, and members of the _______________________________________ Party, hereby certify that ____________________________ (Name of candidate) whose declaration of candidacy is filed herewith, is a member of the ____________ Party, and is, in our opinion, well qualified to perform the duties of the office or position to which that candidate desires to be elected. Street City, and Village or Signature Number Township Ward Precinct County Date (Must use address on file with the board of elections) ________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ - _______________________________________ (Name of circulator of petition), declares under penalty of election falsification that the circulator of the petition is a qualified elector of the state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below the signature of that circulator; that the circulator is a member of the ___________ Party; that the circulator is the circulator of the foregoing petition paper containing _____________ (Number) signatures; that the circulator witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. _____________________________ (Signature of circulator) ____________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) _________________________ (If petition is for a statewide candidate, the name and address of person employing to circulate petition, if any) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of declaration of candidacy and petition, and the form shall be substantially similar to the declaration of candidacy and petition set forth in this section, that will be suitable for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. The petition provided for in this section division shall be circulated only by a member of the same political party as the candidate. (B) The form of declaration of candidacy and petition of a person desiring to be a candidate for nomination or a candidate for election to a nonpartisan office or position to be voted for at a primary election shall be substantially as follows: "DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY NONPARTISAN PRIMARY ELECTION I, ___________________________ (Name of Candidate), the undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election falsification that my voting residence is in _______________ precinct of the _____________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City or Village) in the county of ________________, Ohio; that my voting residence is _______________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the _____________________________ (City or Village) of _________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector in the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I hereby declare that I desire to be ____________________ (a candidate for nomination as a candidate for election to the office of _____________) (a candidate for election to the office or position of ______________) for the ____________ in the state, district, (Full term or unexpired term ending _______________) county, city, or village of ___________________, at the primary election to be held on the _____________ day of _________, ____, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official primary election ballot as a candidate for _________ (such nomination) or (such election) as provided by law. I further declare that, if elected to said office or position, I will qualify therefor. Dated this __________ day of _________________, _________ __________________________________ (Signature of candidate) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. PETITION OF CANDIDATE We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of Ohio, whose voting residence is in the county, city, village, ward, township, or school district, and precinct set opposite our names, hereby certify that ____________________________ (Name of candidate) whose declaration of candidacy is filed herewith is, in our opinion, well qualified to perform the duties of the office or position to which that candidate desires to be elected. Street City, and Village or Signature Number Township Ward Precinct County Date (Must use address on file with the board of elections) _______________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ (Name of circulator of petition), declares under penalty of election falsification that the circulator of the petition is a qualified elector of the state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below the signature of that circulator; that the circulator is the circulator of the foregoing petition paper containing _____________ (Number) signatures; that the circulator witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. _____________________________ (Signature of circulator) ____________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) _________________________ (If petition is for a statewide candidate, the name and address of person employing to circulate petition, if any) I, _________________________________, hereby constitute the persons named below a committee to represent me: Name Residence __________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________ WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." (C) "DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY VOTER-NOMINATED PRIMARY ELECTION I, ___________________________ (Name of Candidate), the undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election falsification that my voting residence is in _______________ precinct of the _____________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City or Village) in the county of ________________, Ohio; that my voting residence is _______________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the _____________________________ (City or Village) of _________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector in the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I hereby declare my preference for (the ________ Party) or (no political party). I hereby declare that I desire to be ____________________ (a candidate for nomination as a candidate for election to the office of _____________) (a candidate for election to the office or position of ______________) for the ____________ in the state, district, (Full term or unexpired term ending _______________) county, city, or village of ___________________, at the primary election to be held on the _____________ day of _________, ____, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official primary election ballot as a candidate for _________ (such nomination) or (such election) as provided by law. I further declare that, if elected to said office or position, I will qualify therefor, and that, if I have here declared a preference for a political party, I will support and abide by the principles enunciated by that party. Dated this __________ day of _________________, _________ __________________________________ (Signature of candidate) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. PETITION OF CANDIDATE We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of Ohio, whose voting residence is in the county, city, village, ward, township, or school district, and precinct set opposite our names, hereby certify that ____________________________ (Name of candidate) whose declaration of candidacy is filed herewith is, in our opinion, well qualified to perform the duties of the office or position to which that candidate desires to be elected. Street City, and Village or Signature Number Township Ward Precinct County Date (Must use address on file with the board of elections) _______________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ (Name of circulator of petition), declares under penalty of election falsification that the circulator of the petition is a qualified elector of the state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below the signature of that circulator; that the circulator is the circulator of the foregoing petition paper containing _____________ (Number) signatures; that the circulator witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of the circulator's knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. _____________________________ (Signature of circulator) ____________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) _________________________ (If petition is for a statewide candidate, the name and address of person employing to circulate petition, if any) I, _________________________________, hereby constitute the persons named below a committee to represent me: Name Residence __________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________ __________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________ WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of declaration of candidacy and petition, and the form shall be substantially similar to the declaration of candidacy and petition set forth in this division, that will be suitable for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. Sec. 3513.13. Separate primary election ballots shall be provided by the board of elections for each political party having candidates for nomination or election in a party primary election. Section 3505.08 of the Revised Code governing the kind of paper, the kind of ink, and the size and style of type to be used in the printing of ballots for general elections shall apply in the printing of ballots for primary elections. Primary Party primary election ballots shall have printed on the back thereof "Official ____________ (name of party) __________ primary ballot," the date of the election, and the facsimile signatures of the members of the board. Such ballots shall have stubs attached at the top thereof as required on ballots for general elections. On the back of every such ballot used there shall be a solid black line printed opposite the blank rectangular space that is used to mark the choice of the voter. This line shall be printed wide enough so that the mark in the blank rectangular space will not be visible from the back side of the ballot. Such ballots shall have printed at the top thereof and below the stubs "Official __________ (name of party) ___________ primary ballot" and instructions to the voter to the effect that to vote for a candidate the voter shall record the vote in the manner provided on the ballot next to the name of such candidate, except as provided in section 3513.151 of the Revised Code, and that if hea voter who tears, soils, defaces, or erroneously marks the ballot he may return it to the precinct election officers and obtain another ballot. Except as provided in section 3513.151 of the Revised Code, party primary election ballots shall contain the names of all persons whose declarations of candidacy and petitions have been determined to be valid. The name of each candidate for nomination for, or election to, an office or position shall be printed in an enclosed rectangular space at the left of which an enclosed blank rectangular space shall be provided. The names of candidates shall be printed on the ballot immediately below the title of the office or position for nomination or election to which the candidate seeks nomination or election. The order in which offices and positions shall be listed on the ballot shall be prescribed by and shall be certified to each board by the secretary of state, and shall be the same, to the extent the secretary of state deems practicable, as is provided for the listing of offices on general election ballots. Sec. 3513.14. (A) Except in elections for which the board of elections has received no valid declarations of intent to be a write-in candidate under section 3513.041 of the Revised Code, immediately below the title of each office for which nominations are to be made and the names of candidates for such nomination printed thereunder, there shall be provided on each primary election ballot as many blank spaces as, but not more than, the number of nominations to be made for such office, in which the voter may write the names of persons for whose nomination hethe voter desires to vote, provided that inasmuch as candidates for the office of delegate and alternate to the national and state conventions, member of the state central committee, and member of the county central committee are elected at the primary election no blank space shall be left on the ballot after the names of the candidates for such office, and no vote shall be counted for any person whose name has been written in on said ballot for any of such offices. If no person files and qualifies as a candidate for the office of member of the state central committee or member of the county central committee such office shall not appear on the ballot. (B) The face of the ballot below the stub, for a party primary, shall be substantially in the following form: OFFICIAL ____________(name of party)__________ PRIMARY BALLOT (A)(1) To vote for a candidate record your vote in the manner provided next to the name of such candidate. (B)(2) If you tear, soil, deface, or erroneously mark this ballot return it to the election officials and obtain another. (C) The face of the ballot below the stub, for a primary election for a voter-nominated or nonpartisan office, shall be substantially in the following form: OFFICIAL PRIMARY BALLOT (1) To vote for a candidate record your vote in the manner provided next to the name of such candidate. (2) If you tear, soil, deface, or erroneously mark this ballot return it to the election officials and obtain another. Sec. 3513.19. (A) It is the duty of any precinct election official, whenever any such official doubts that a person attempting to vote at a primary election is legally entitled to vote at that election, to challenge the right of that person to vote. The right of a person to vote at a primary election may be challenged upon the following grounds: (1) That the person whose right to vote is challenged is not a legally qualified elector; (2) That the person has received or has been promised some valuable reward or consideration for the person's vote; (3) That If the election is a party primary, that the person is not affiliated with or is not a member of the political party whose ballot the person desires to vote. Such party affiliation shall be determined by examining the elector's voting record for the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years as shown on the voter's registration card, using the standards of affiliation specified in the seventh paragraph of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code. Division (A)(3) of this section and the seventh paragraph of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code do not prohibit a person who holds an elective office for which candidates are nominated at a party primary election from doing any of the following: (a) If the person voted as a member of a different political party at any primary election within the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years, being a candidate for nomination at a party primary held during the times specified in division (C)(2) of section 3513.191 of the Revised Code provided that the person complies with the requirements of that section; (b) Circulating the person's own petition of candidacy for party nomination in the primary election. (B) When the right of a person to vote is challenged upon the ground set forth in division (A)(3) of this section, membership in or political affiliation with a political party shall be determined by the person's statement, made under penalty of election falsification, that the person desires to be affiliated with and supports the principles of the political party whose primary ballot the person desires to vote. Sec. 3513.20. Before any challenged person shall be allowed to vote at a primary election, the person shall make a statement, under penalty of election falsification, before one of the precinct officials, blanks for which shall be furnished by the board of elections, giving name, age, residence, length of residence in the precinct, county, and state; if applicable, stating that the person desires to be affiliated with and supports the principles of the political party whose party primary ballot the person desires to vote; and giving all other facts necessary to determine whether the person is entitled to vote in that primary election. The statement shall be returned to the office of the board with the pollbooks and tally sheets. If a person challenged refuses to make that statement under penalty of election falsification, the person shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. If a majority of the precinct officials finds that the statements of a person challenged or the person's voting record or other evidence shows that the person lacks any of the qualifications required to make the person a qualified elector at the primary election or, if applicable, that the person is not affiliated with or is not a member of the political party whose ballot the person desires to vote, the person shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3513.22. (A) Not earlier than the fifth day or later than the fifteenth day after a primary election, the board of elections shall begin to canvass the election returns from the precincts in which electors were entitled to vote at that election and shall continue the canvass daily until it is completed. The board shall complete the canvass not later than the twenty-first day after the day of the election. Eighty-one days after the day of the election, the canvass of election returns shall be deemed final, and no amendments to the canvass may be made after that date. The secretary of state may specify an earlier date upon which the canvass of election returns shall be deemed final, and after which amendments to the final canvass may not be made, if so required by federal law. (B) The county executive committee of each political party that participated in the election, and each committee designated in a petition to represent the petitioners pursuant to which a question or issue was submitted at the election, may designate a qualified elector who may be present at and may observe the making of the canvass. Each person for whom votes were cast in the election may also be present at and observe the making of the canvass. (C) When the canvass of the election returns from all of the precincts in the county in which electors were entitled to vote at the election has been completed, the board shall determine and declare the results of the elections determined by the electors of the county or of a district or subdivision within the county. If more than the number of persons to be nominated for or elected to an office received the largest and an equal number of votes, the tie shall be resolved by lot by the chairperson of the board in the presence of a majority of the members of the board. The declaration shall be in writing and shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the board. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy of it shall be posted by the board in a conspicuous place in its office. The board shall keep the copy posted for a period of at least five days. The board shall promptly certify abstracts of the results of the elections within its county upon forms the secretary of state prescribes. One certified copy of each abstract shall be kept in the office of the board, and one certified copy of each abstract shall promptly be sent to the secretary of state. The board shall also promptly send a certified copy of that part of an abstract that pertains to an election in which only electors of a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state voted to the board of the most populous county in the district. It shall also promptly send a certified copy of that part of an abstract that pertains to an election in which only electors of a subdivision located partly within the county voted to the board of the county in which the major portion of the population of the subdivision is located. If, after certifying and sending abstracts and parts of abstracts, a board finds that any abstract or part of any abstract is incorrect, it shall promptly prepare, certify, and send a corrected abstract or part of an abstract to take the place of each incorrect abstract or part of an abstract previously certified and sent. (D)(1) When certified copies of abstracts are received by the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall canvass those abstracts and determine and declare the results of all elections in which electors throughout the entire state voted. If more than the number of persons to be nominated for or elected to an office received the largest and an equal number of votes, the tie shall be resolved by lot by the secretary of state in the presence of the governor, the auditor of state, and the attorney general, who at the request of the secretary of state shall assemble to witness the drawing of the lot. The declaration of results by the secretary of state shall be in writing and shall be signed by the secretary of state. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy of it shall be posted by the secretary of state in a conspicuous place in the secretary of state's office. The secretary of state shall keep the copy posted for a period of at least five days. (2) When certified copies of parts of abstracts are received by the board of the most populous county in a district from the boards of all of the counties in the district, the board receiving those abstracts shall canvass them and determine and declare the results of the elections in which only electors of the district voted. If more than the number of persons to be nominated for or elected to an office received the largest and equal number of votes, the tie shall be resolved by lot by the chairperson of the board in the presence of a majority of the members of the board. The declaration of results by the board shall be in writing and shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the board. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy of it shall be posted by the board in a conspicuous place in its office. The board shall keep the copy posted for a period of at least five days. (3) When certified copies of parts of abstracts are received by the board of a county in which the major portion of the population of a subdivision located in more than one county is located from the boards of each county in which other portions of that subdivision are located, the board receiving those abstracts shall canvass them and determine and declare the results of the elections in which only electors of that subdivision voted. If more than the number of persons to be nominated for or elected to an office received the largest and an equal number of votes, the tie shall be resolved by lot by the chairperson of the board in the presence of a majority of the members of the board. The declaration of results by the board shall be in writing and shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the board. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy of it shall be posted by the board in a conspicuous place in its office. The board shall keep the copy posted for a period of at least five days. (E) Election officials, who are required to declare the results of primary elections, shall issue to each person declared nominated for or elected to an office, an appropriate certificate of nomination or election, provided that the boards required to determine and declare the results of the elections for candidates for nomination to the office of representative to congress from a congressional district shall, in lieu of issuing a certificate of nomination, certify to the secretary of state the names of the candidates nominated, and the secretary of state, upon receipt of that certification, shall issue a certificate of nomination to each person whose name is so certified. Certificates of nomination or election issued by boards to candidates and certifications to the secretary of state shall not be issued before the expiration of the time within which applications for recounts of votes may be filed or before recounts of votes, which have been applied for, are completed. Sec. 3513.23. (A) If an elector voting at a primary election writes in a blank space provided for that purpose on the ballot of one political party under the title of an office for which a nomination is to be made the name of a person other than the persons whose names are printed on the ballot as candidates for the nomination, and if that elector records the vote in the manner provided on the ballot next to the name written, that ballot shall be counted as a vote for the nomination of the person whose name is so written if that person has filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate under section 3513.041 of the Revised Code. (B) In no event shall a person whose name is written on a primary election ballot be nominated as a candidate for election to an office if the name of no person living on the day of that primary election is printed on the ballot as a candidate for that nomination, unless the total number of votes cast for the person whose name is written on the ballot is not less than that number of petition signatures that would have been required for the printing of the person's name on the primary ballot pursuant to section 3513.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3513.257. Each person desiring to become an independent candidate for an office for which candidates may be nominated at a primary election, except persons desiring to become independent joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor and for the offices of president and vice-president of the United States, shall file no later than four p.m. of the day before the day of the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which such candidacy is to be voted for by the voters, a statement of candidacy and nominating petition as provided in section 3513.261 of the Revised Code. Persons desiring to become independent joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall file, not later than four p.m. of the day before the day of the primary election, one statement of candidacy and one nominating petition for the two of them. Persons desiring to become independent joint candidates for the offices of president and vice-president of the United States shall file, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the general election at which the president and vice-president are to be elected, one statement of candidacy and one nominating petition for the two of them. The prospective independent joint candidates' statement of candidacy shall be filed with the nominating petition as one instrument. The statement of candidacy and separate petition papers of each candidate or pair of joint candidates shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. The nominating petition shall contain signatures of qualified electors of the district, political subdivision, or portion of a political subdivision in which the candidacy is to be voted on in an amount to be determined as follows: (A) If the candidacy is to be voted on by electors throughout the entire state, the The nominating petition, including the nominating petition of independent joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by no less than five thousand qualified electors, provided that no petition shall be accepted for filing if it purports to contain more than fifteen thousand signatures. (B) If the candidacy is to be voted on by electors in any district, political subdivision, or part thereof in which less than five thousand electors voted for the office of governor at the most recent election for that office, the nominating petition shall contain signatures of not less than twenty-five qualified electors of the district, political subdivision, or part thereof, or a number of qualified signatures equal to at least five per cent of that vote, if this number is less than twenty-five. (C) If the candidacy is to be voted on by electors in any district, political subdivision, or part thereof in which five thousand or more electors voted for the office of governor at the most recent election for that office, the nominating petition shall contain a number of signatures equal to at least one per cent of those electors. All nominating petitions of candidates for offices to be voted on by electors throughout the entire state shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. No nominating petition for the offices of president and vice-president of the United States shall be accepted for filing unless there is submitted to the secretary of state, at the time of filing the petition, a slate of presidential electors sufficient in number to satisfy the requirement of the United States Constitution. The secretary of state shall not accept for filing the statement of candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of governor unless it also shows the joint candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of lieutenant governor, shall not accept for filing the statement of candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of lieutenant governor unless it also shows the joint candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of governor, and shall not accept for filing the statement of candidacy of a person who desires to be an independent candidate to the office of governor or lieutenant governor who, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a statement of candidacy, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any other state office or any federal or county office. Nominating petitions of candidates for offices to be voted on by electors within a district or political subdivision comprised of more than one county but less than all counties of the state shall be filed with the boards of elections of that county or part of a county within the district or political subdivision which had a population greater than that of any other county or part of a county within the district or political subdivision according to the last federal decennial census. Nominating petitions for offices to be voted on by electors within a county or district smaller than a county shall be filed with the board of elections for such county. No petition other than the petition of a candidate whose candidacy is to be considered by electors throughout the entire state shall be accepted for filing if it appears on its face to contain more than three times the minimum required number of signatures. A board of elections shall not accept for filing a nominating petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the nominating petition is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures accepted exceeds three times the minimum number of signatures required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying signatures when the number of verified signatures on a petition equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. Any candidate, other than a candidate for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, who files a nominating petition may request, at the time of filing, that the candidate be designated on the ballot as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate, or may request that the candidate's name be placed on the ballot without any designation. Any such candidate who fails to request a designation either as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate shall have the candidate's name placed on the ballot without any designation. The purpose of establishing a filing deadline for independent candidates prior to the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which the candidacy is to be voted on by the voters is to recognize that the state has a substantial and compelling interest in protecting its electoral process by encouraging political stability, ensuring that the winner of the election will represent a majority of the community, providing the electorate with an understandable ballot, and enhancing voter education, thus fostering informed and educated expressions of the popular will in a general election. The filing deadline for independent candidates required in this section prevents splintered parties and unrestrained factionalism, avoids political fragmentation, and maintains the integrity of the ballot. The deadline, one day prior to the primary election, is the least drastic or restrictive means of protecting these state interests. The general assembly finds that the filing deadline for independent candidates in primary elections required in this section is reasonably related to the state's purpose of ensuring fair and honest elections while leaving unimpaired the political, voting, and associational rights secured by the first and fourteenth amendments to the United States Constitution. Sec. 3513.261. A nominating petition may consist of one or more separate petition papers, each of which shall be substantially in the form prescribed in this section. If the petition consists of more than one separate petition paper, the statement of candidacy of the candidate or joint candidates named need be signed by the candidate or joint candidates on only one of such separate petition papers, but the statement of candidacy so signed shall be copied on each other separate petition paper before the signatures of electors are placed on it. Each nominating petition containing signatures of electors of more than one county shall consist of separate petition papers each of which shall contain signatures of electors of only one county; provided that petitions containing signatures of electors of more than one county shall not thereby be declared invalid. In case petitions containing signatures of electors of more than one county are filed, the board of elections shall determine the county from which the majority of the signatures came, and only signatures from this county shall be counted. Signatures from any other county shall be invalid. All signatures on nominating petitions shall be written in ink or indelible pencil. At the time of filing a nominating petition, the candidate designated in the nominating petition, and joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor, shall pay to the election officials with whom it is filed the fees specified for the office under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code, if applicable. The fees shall be disposed of by those election officials in the manner that is provided in section 3513.10 of the Revised Code for the disposition of other fees, and in no case shall a fee required under that section be returned to a candidate. Candidates or joint candidates whose names are written on the ballot, and who are elected, shall pay the same fees under section 3513.10 of the Revised Code that candidates who file nominating petitions pay. Payment of these fees shall be a condition precedent to the granting of their certificates of election. Each nominating petition shall contain a statement of candidacy that shall be signed by the candidate or joint candidates named in it or by an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. Such statement of candidacy shall contain a declaration made under penalty of election falsification that the candidate desires to be a candidate for the office named in it, and that the candidate is an elector qualified to vote for the office the candidate seeks. The form of the nominating petition and statement of candidacy shall be substantially as follows: "STATEMENT OF CANDIDACY I, ___________________________________ (Name of candidate), the undersigned, hereby declare under penalty of election falsification that my voting residence is in ________________ __________ Precinct of the _________________________ (Township) or (Ward and City, or Village) in the county of _______________ Ohio; that my post-office address is ____________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of the _______________________________ (City, Village, or post office) of ____________________, Ohio; and that I am a qualified elector in the precinct in which my voting residence is located. I hereby declare that I desire to be a candidate for election to the office of ______________ in the ________________________ (State, District, County, City, Village, Township, or School District) for the ______________________________________ (Full term or unexpired term ending ________________) at the General Election to be held on the ___________ day of ___________, ____ I further declare that I am an elector qualified to vote for the office I seek. Dated this _______ day of ______________, ____ ___________________________ (Signature of candidate) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. I, _________________________________, hereby constitute the persons named below a committee to represent me: Name Residence _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________________ NOMINATING PETITION We, the undersigned, qualified electors of the state of Ohio, whose voting residence is in the County, City, Village, Ward, Township or Precinct set opposite our names, hereby nominate ____________________ as a candidate for election to the office of ___________________________ in the ____________________________ (State, District, County, City, Village, Township, or School District) for the _________________ (Full term or unexpired term ending ___________________) to be voted for at the general election next hereafter to be held, and certify that this person is, in our opinion, well qualified to perform the duties of the office or position to which the person desires to be elected. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 A Street B Address C or R.F.D. D (Must use E address on City, F file with Village G the board of or Date of H Signature elections) Township Ward Precinct County Signing ____________________________________________________________ ____________________________________________________________ ____________________________________________________________ ___________________________, declares under penalty of election falsification that such person is a qualified elector of the state of Ohio and resides at the address appearing below such person's signature hereto; that such person is the circulator of the foregoing petition paper containing ________________ signatures; that such person witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of such person's knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of such person's knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. ___________________________ (Signature of circulator) ___________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) ___________________________ (If petition is for a statewide candidate, the name and address of person employing circulator to circulate petition, if any) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of nominating petition for a group of candidates for the office of member of a board of education, township office, and offices of municipal corporations of under two thousand population. The secretary of state shall prescribe a form of statement of candidacy and nominating petition, which shall be substantially similar to the form of statement of candidacy and nominating petition set forth in this section, that will be suitable for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. If such petition nominates a candidate whose election is to be determined by the electors of a county or a district or subdivision within the county, it shall be filed with the board of such county. If the petition nominates a candidate whose election is to be determined by the voters of a subdivision located in more than one county, it shall be filed with the board of the county in which the major portion of the population of such subdivision is located. If the petition nominates a candidate whose election is to be determined by the electors of a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state, it shall be filed with the board of elections of the most populous county in such district. If the petition nominates a candidate whose election is to be determined by the electors of the state at largejoint candidates for the offices of president and vice president of the United States, it shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a nominating petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the nominating petition is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. Sec. 3513.262. The nominating petitions of all candidates required to be filed before four p.m. of the day before the day of the primary election immediately preceding the general election shall be processed as follows: If such petition is filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall, not later than the fifteenth day of June following the filing of such petition, or if the primary election was a presidential primary election, not later than the end of the sixth week after the day of that election, transmit to each board such separate petition papers as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of such board. If such petition is filed with the board of the most populous county of a district or of a county in which the major portion of the population of a subdivision is located, such board shall, not later than the fifteenth day of June, or if the primary election was a presidential primary election, not later than the end of the sixth week after the day of that election, transmit to each board within such district such separate petition papers of the petition as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of such board. All petition papers so transmitted to a board and all nominating petitions filed with a board shall, under proper regulations, be open to public inspection from the fifteenth day of June until four p.m. of the thirtieth day of that month, or if the primary election was a presidential primary election, from the end of the sixth week after the election until four p.m. of the end of the seventh week after the election. Each board shall, not later than the next fifteenth day of July, or if the primary election was a presidential primary election, not later than the end of the tenth week after the day of that election, examine and determine the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition papers transmitted to or filed with it, and the validity of the petitions filed with it, and shall return to the secretary of state all petition papers transmitted to it by the secretary of state, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of signatures thereon, and shall return to each other board all petition papers transmitted to it by such other board, as provided in this section, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of signatures thereon. A signature on a nominating petition is not valid if it is dated more than one year before the date the nominating petition was filed. All other matters affecting the validity or invalidity of such petition papers shall be determined by the secretary of state or the board with whom such petition papers were filed. Written protests against nominating petitions may be filed by any qualified elector eligible to vote for the candidate whose nominating petition the elector objects to, not later than four p.m. of the thirtieth day of July, or if the primary election was a presidential primary election, not later than the end of the twelfth week after the day of that election. Such protests shall be filed with the election officials with whom the nominating petition was filed. Upon the filing of such protest, the election officials with whom it is filed shall promptly fix the time and place for hearing it, and shall forthwith mail notice of the filing of such protest and the time and place for hearing it to the person whose nomination is protested. They shall also forthwith mail notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing to the person who filed the protest. At the time fixed, such election officials shall hear the protest and determine the validity or invalidity of the petition. Such determination shall be final. A protest against the nominating petition filed by joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be filed, heard, and determined in the same manner as a protest against the nominating petition of a candidate who files individually. Sec. 3513.30. (A)(1) If only one valid declaration of candidacy is filed for nomination as a candidate of a political party for an a partisan office and that candidate dies prior to the tenth day before the primary election, both of the following may occur: (a) The political party whose candidate died may fill the vacancy so created as provided in division (A)(2) of this section. (b) Any major political party other than the one whose candidate died may select a candidate as provided in division (A)(2) of this section under either of the following circumstances: (i) No person has filed a valid declaration of candidacy for nomination as that party's candidate at the primary election. (ii) Only one person has filed a valid declaration of candidacy for nomination as that party's candidate at the primary election, that person has withdrawn, died, or been disqualified under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, and the vacancy so created has not been filled. (2) A vacancy may be filled under division (A)(1)(a) and a selection may be made under division (A)(1)(b) of this section by the appropriate committee of the political party in the same manner as provided in divisions (A) to (E) of section 3513.31 of the Revised Code for the filling of similar vacancies created by withdrawals or disqualifications under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code after the primary election, except that the certification required under that section may not be filed with the secretary of state, or with a board of the most populous county of a district, or with the board of a county in which the major portion of the population of a subdivision is located, later than four p.m. of the tenth day before the day of such primary election, or with any other board later than four p.m. of the fifth day before the day of such primary election. (3) If only one valid declaration of candidacy is filed for nomination as a candidate of a political party for an office and that candidate dies on or after the tenth day before the day of the primary election, that candidate is considered to have received the nomination of that candidate's political party at that primary election, and, for purposes of filling the vacancy so created, that candidate's death shall be treated as if that candidate died on the day after the day of the primary election. (B) Any person filing a declaration of candidacy may withdraw as such candidate at any time prior to the primary election. The withdrawal shall be effected and the statement of withdrawal shall be filed in accordance with the procedures prescribed in division (D) of this section for the withdrawal of persons nominated in a primary election or by nominating petition. (C) A person who is the first choice for president of the United States by a candidate for delegate or alternate to a national convention of a political party may withdraw consent for the selection of the person as such first choice no later than four p.m. of the fortieth day before the day of the presidential primary election. Withdrawal of consent shall be for the entire slate of candidates for delegates and alternates who named such person as their presidential first choice and shall constitute withdrawal from the primary election by such delegates and alternates. The withdrawal shall be made in writing and delivered to the secretary of state. If the withdrawal is delivered to the secretary of state on or before the seventieth day before the day of the primary election, the boards of elections shall remove both the name of the withdrawn first choice and the names of such withdrawn candidates from the ballots according to the directions of the secretary of state. If the withdrawal is delivered to the secretary of state after the seventieth day before the day of the primary election, the board of elections shall not remove the name of the withdrawn first choice and the names of the withdrawn candidates from the ballots. The board of elections shall post a notice at each polling location on the day of the primary election, and shall enclose with each absent voter's ballot given or mailed after the candidate withdraws, a notice that votes for the withdrawn first choice or the withdrawn candidates will be void and will not be counted. If such names are not removed from all ballots before the day of the election, the votes for the withdrawn first choice or the withdrawn candidates are void and shall not be counted. (D) Any person nominated in a primary election or by nominating petition as a candidate for election at the next general election may withdraw as such candidate at any time prior to the general election. Such withdrawal may be effected by the filing of a written statement by such candidate announcing the candidate's withdrawal and requesting that the candidate's name not be printed on the ballots. If such candidate's declaration of candidacy or nominating petition was filed with the secretary of state, the candidate's statement of withdrawal shall be addressed to and filed with the secretary of state. If such candidate's declaration of candidacy or nominating petition was filed with a board of elections, the candidate's statement of withdrawal shall be addressed to and filed with such board. (E) When a person withdraws under division (B) or (D) of this section on or before the seventieth day before the day of the primary election or the general election, the board of elections shall remove the name of the withdrawn candidate from the ballots according to the directions of the secretary of state. When a person withdraws under division (B) or (D) of this section after the seventieth day before the day of the primary election or the general election, the board of elections shall not remove the name of the withdrawn candidate from the ballots. The board of elections shall post a notice at each polling place on the day of the election, and shall enclose with each absent voter's ballot given or mailed after the candidate withdraws, a notice that votes for the withdrawn candidate will be void and will not be counted. If the name is not removed from all ballots before the day of the election, the votes for the withdrawn candidate are void and shall not be counted. Sec. 3513.31. (A) If a person nominated in a party primary election as a candidate for election at the next general election, whose candidacy is to be submitted to the electors of the entire state, withdraws as that candidate or is disqualified as that candidate under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, the vacancy in the party nomination so created may be filled by the state central committee of the major political party that made the nomination at the primary election, if the committee's chairperson and secretary certify the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy by the time specified in this division, at a meeting called for that purpose. The meeting shall be called by the chairperson of that committee, who shall give each member of the committee at least two days' notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting. If a majority of the members of the committee are present at the meeting, a majority of those present may select a person to fill the vacancy. The chairperson and secretary of the meeting shall certify in writing and under oath to the secretary of state, not later than the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election, the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy. The certification must be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is certified. A vacancy in a party nomination that may be filled by a minor political party shall be filled in accordance with the party's rules by authorized officials of the party. Certification must be made as in the manner provided for a major political party. (B) If a person nominated in a party primary election as a party candidate for election at the next general election, whose candidacy is to be submitted to the electors of a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state, withdraws as that candidate or is disqualified as that candidate under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, the vacancy in the party nomination so created may be filled by a district committee of the major political party that made the nomination at the primary election, if the committee's chairperson and secretary certify the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy by the time specified in this division, at a meeting called for that purpose. The district committee shall consist of the chairperson and secretary of the county central committee of such political party in each county in the district. The district committee shall be called by the chairperson of the county central committee of such political party of the most populous county in the district, who shall give each member of the district committee at least two days' notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting. If a majority of the members of the district committee are present at the district committee meeting, a majority of those present may select a person to fill the vacancy. The chairperson and secretary of the meeting shall certify in writing and under oath to the board of elections of the most populous county in the district, not later than four p.m. of the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election, the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy. The certification must be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is certified. A vacancy in a party nomination that may be filled by a minor political party shall be filled in accordance with the party's rules by authorized officials of the party. Certification must be made as in the manner provided for a major political party. (C) If a person nominated in a party primary election as a party candidate for election at the next general election, whose candidacy is to be submitted to the electors of a county, withdraws as that candidate or is disqualified as that candidate under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, the vacancy in the party nomination so created may be filled by the county central committee of the major political party that made the nomination at the primary election, or by the county executive committee if so authorized, if the committee's chairperson and secretary certify the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy by the time specified in this division, at a meeting called for that purpose. The meeting shall be called by the chairperson of that committee, who shall give each member of the committee at least two days' notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting. If a majority of the members of the committee are present at the meeting, a majority of those present may select a person to fill the vacancy. The chairperson and secretary of the meeting shall certify in writing and under oath to the board of that county, not later than four p.m. of the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election, the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy. The certification must be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is certified. A vacancy in a party nomination that may be filled by a minor political party shall be filled in accordance with the party's rules by authorized officials of the party. Certification must be made as in the manner provided for a major political party. (D) If a person nominated in a party primary election as a party candidate for election at the next general election, whose candidacy is to be submitted to the electors of a district within a county, withdraws as that candidate or is disqualified as that candidate under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, the vacancy in the party nomination so created may be filled by a district committee consisting of those members of the county central committee or, if so authorized, those members of the county executive committee in that county of the major political party that made the nomination at the primary election who represent the precincts or the wards and townships within the district, if the committee's chairperson and secretary certify the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy by the time specified in this division, at a meeting called for that purpose. The district committee meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the county central committee or executive committee, as appropriate, who shall give each member of the district committee at least two days' notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting. If a majority of the members of the district committee are present at the district committee meeting, a majority of those present may select a person to fill the vacancy. The chairperson and secretary of the district committee meeting shall certify in writing and under oath to the board of the county, not later than four p.m. of the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election, the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy. The certification must be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is certified. A vacancy in a party nomination that may be filled by a minor political party shall be filled in accordance with the party's rules by authorized officials of the party. Certification must be made as in the manner provided for a major political party. (E) If a person nominated in a party primary election as a party candidate for election at the next general election, whose candidacy is to be submitted to the electors of a subdivision within a county, withdraws as that candidate or is disqualified as that candidate under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, the vacancy in the party nomination so created may be filled by a subdivision committee consisting of those members of the county central committee or, if so authorized, those members of the county executive committee in that county of the major political party that made the nomination at that primary election who represent the precincts or the wards and townships within that subdivision, if the committee's chairperson and secretary certify the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy by the time specified in this division, at a meeting called for that purpose. The subdivision committee meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the county central committee or executive committee, as appropriate, who shall give each member of the subdivision committee at least two days' notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting. If a majority of the members of the subdivision committee are present at the subdivision committee meeting, a majority of those present may select a person to fill the vacancy. The chairperson and secretary of the subdivision committee meeting shall certify in writing and under oath to the board of the county, not later than four p.m. of the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election, the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy. The certification must be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is certified. A vacancy in a party nomination that may be filled by a minor political party shall be filled in accordance with the party's rules by authorized officials of the party. Certification must be made in the manner provided for a major political party. (F) If a person nominated by petition as an independent or nonpartisan candidate for election to a voter-nominated or nonpartisan office at the next general election withdraws as that candidate or is disqualified as that candidate under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, the vacancy so created may be filled by a majority of the committee of five, as designated on the candidate's nominating petition or declaration of candidacy, if a member of that committee certifies in writing and under oath to the election officials with whom the candidate filed the candidate's nominating petition or declaration of candidacy, not later than the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election, the name of the person selected to fill the vacancy. The certification shall be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is certified and shall be made in the manner provided for a major political party. (G) If a person nominated in a primary election or nominated by petition under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code as a party candidate for election at the next general election dies, the vacancy so created may be filled by the same committee in the same manner as provided in this section for the filling of similar vacancies created by withdrawals or disqualifications under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code, except that the certification, when filling a vacancy created by death, may not be filed with the secretary of state, or with a board of the most populous county of a district, or with the board of a county in which the major portion of the population of a subdivision is located, later than four p.m. of the tenth day before the day of such general election, or with any other board later than four p.m. of the fifth day before the day of such general election. (H) If a person nominated by petition as an independent or nonpartisan candidate for election at the next general election dies prior to the tenth day before the day of that general election, the vacancy so created may be filled by a majority of the committee of five designated in the nominating petition to represent the candidate named in it. To fill the vacancy a member of the committee shall, not later than four p.m. of the fifth day before the day of the general election, file with the election officials with whom the petition nominating the person was filed, a certificate signed and sworn to under oath by a majority of the members, designating the person they select to fill the vacancy. The certification must be accompanied by the written acceptance of the nomination by the person whose name is so certified. (I) If a person holding an elective partisan office dies or resigns subsequent to the one hundred fifteenth day before the day of a primary election and prior to the eighty-sixth day before the day of the next general election, and if, under the laws of this state, a person may be elected at that general election to fill the unexpired term of the person who has died or resigned, the appropriate committee of each political party, acting as in the case of a vacancy in a party nomination, as provided in divisions (A) to (D) of this section, may select a person as the party candidate for election for such unexpired term at that general election, and certify the person's name to the appropriate election official not later than four p.m. on the eighty-sixth day before the day of that general election, or on the tenth day following the day on which the vacancy occurs, whichever is later. When the vacancy occurs on or subsequent to the eighty-sixth day and six or more days prior to the fortieth day before the general election, the appropriate committee may select a person as the party candidate and certify the person's name, as provided in the preceding sentence, not later than four p.m. on the tenth day following the day on which the vacancy occurs. When the vacancy occurs fewer than six days before the fortieth day before the general election, the deadline for filing shall be four p.m. on the thirty-sixth day before the general election. Thereupon the name shall be printed as the party candidate under proper titles and in the proper place on the proper ballots for use at the election. If a person has been nominated in a primary election or nominated by petition under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, the authorized committee of that political party shall not select and certify a person as the party candidate. (I) If a person holding an elective voter-nominated or nonpartisan office dies or resigns subsequent to the one hundred fifteenth day before the day of a primary election and prior to the eighty-sixth day before the day of the next general election, and if, under the laws of this state, a person may be elected at that general election to fill the unexpired term of the person who has died or resigned, the majority of the vacating person's committee of five, acting as in the case of a vacancy in a nomination, as provided in division (F) of this section, may select a person as the candidate for election for such unexpired term at that general election and certify the selected person's name to the appropriate election official not later than four p.m. on the eighty-sixth day before the day of that general election, or on the tenth day following the day on which the vacancy occurs, whichever is later. When the vacancy occurs on or subsequent to the eighty-sixth day and six or more days prior to the fortieth day before the general election, the committee of five may select a person as the candidate and certify the selected person's name, as provided in the preceding sentence, not later than four p.m. on the tenth day following the day on which the vacancy occurs. When the vacancy occurs fewer than six days before the fortieth day before the general election, the deadline for filing shall be four p.m. on the thirty-sixth day before the general election. Thereupon the name shall be printed as the candidate under proper titles and in the proper place on the proper ballots for use at the election. (J) Each person desiring to become an independent a candidate to fill the unexpired term shall file a statement of candidacy and nominating petition, as provided in section 3513.261 of the Revised Code, with the appropriate election official not later than four p.m. on the tenth day following the day on which the vacancy occurs, provided that when the vacancy occurs fewer than six days before the fifty-sixth day before the general election, the deadline for filing shall be four p.m. on the fiftieth day before the general election. The nominating petition shall contain at least seven hundred fifty signatures and no more than one thousand five hundred signatures of qualified electors of the district, political subdivision, or portion of a political subdivision in which the office is to be voted upon, or the amount provided for in section 3513.257 of the Revised Code, whichever is less. (K) When a person nominated as a candidate by a political party in a party primary election or by nominating petition for an elective office for which candidates are nominated at a party primary election withdraws, dies, or is disqualified under section 3513.052 of the Revised Code prior to the general election, the appropriate committee of any other major political party or committee of five that has not nominated a candidate for that office, or whose nominee as a candidate for that office has withdrawn, died, or been disqualified without the vacancy so created having been filled, may, acting as in the case of a vacancy in a party nomination or nomination by petition as provided in divisions (A) to (F) of this section, whichever is appropriate, select a person as a candidate of that party or of that committee of five for election to the office. Sec. 3513.311. (A) If a candidate for lieutenant governor dies, withdraws, or is disqualified as a candidate prior to the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, the vacancy on the ballot shall be filled by appointment by the joint candidate for the office of governor. Such candidate for governor shall certify in writing and under oath to the secretary of state not later than the sixty-fifth day before the day of such election the name and residence address of the person selected to fill such vacancy. (B) If a candidate for governor dies, withdraws, or is disqualified as a candidate prior to the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, the vacancy on the ballot shall be filled by appointment by the joint candidate for the office of lieutenant governor. Such candidate for lieutenant governor shall certify in writing and under oath to the secretary of state not later than the sixty-fifth day before the day of such election the name and residence address of the person selected to fill such vacancy. (C) If a candidate for the office of lieutenant governor dies on or after the seventieth day, but prior to the tenth day, before a primary election, the vacancy so created shall be filled by appointment by the joint candidate for the office of governor. Such candidate for governor shall certify in writing and under oath to the secretary of state not later than the fifth day before the day of such election the name and residence address of the person selected to fill such vacancy. (D) If a candidate for the office of governor dies on or after the seventieth day, but prior to the tenth day, before a primary election, the vacancy so created shall be filled by appointment by the joint candidate for the office of lieutenant governor. Such candidate for lieutenant governor shall certify in writing and under oath to the secretary of state not later than the fifth day before the day of such election the name and residence address of the person selected to fill such vacancy. (E) If a person nominated in a primary election or nominated by petition under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code as a candidate for election to the office of governor or lieutenant governor at the next general election withdraws as such candidate prior to the ninetieth day before the day of the general election or dies prior to the tenth day before the day of such general election, the vacancy so created shall be filled in the manner provided for by section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (F) If a person nominated by petition as an independent candidate for election to the office of governor or lieutenant governor withdraws as such candidate prior to the ninetieth day before the day of the general election or dies prior to the tenth day before the day of such general election, the vacancy so created shall be filled by the candidates' committee in the manner provided for, as in the case of death, by section 3513.31 of the Revised Code, except that, in the case of withdrawal of candidacy, the name and residence address of the replacement candidate shall be certified in writing and under oath to the secretary of state not later than the eighty-sixth day before the day of the general election. (G) If the vacancy in a joint candidacy for governor and lieutenant governor can be filled in accordance with this section and is not so filled, the joint candidacy which has not been vacated shall be invalidated and shall not be presented for election. (H)(G) Any replacement candidate appointed or selected pursuant to this section shall be one who has the qualifications of an elector. Sec. 3517.01. (A)(1) A political party within the meaning of Title XXXV of the Revised Code is any group of voters that meets either of the following requirements: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, at the most recent regular state election, the group polled for its candidate for governor in the state or nominees for presidential electors at least three per cent of the entire vote cast for that office in this state. A group that meets the requirements of this division remains a political party for a period of four years after meeting those requirements. (b) The group filed with the secretary of state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division (A)(1)(a) of this section, a party formation petition that meets all of the following requirements: (i) The petition is signed by qualified electors equal in number to at least one per cent of the total vote for governor or nominees for presidential electors at the most recent election for such office. (ii) The petition is signed by not fewer than five hundred qualified electors from each of at least a minimum of one-half of the congressional districts in this state. If an odd number of congressional districts exists in this state, the number of districts that results from dividing the number of congressional districts by two shall be rounded up to the next whole number. (iii) The petition declares the petitioners' intention of organizing a political party, the name of which shall be stated in the declaration, and of participating in the succeeding general election, held in even-numbered years, that occurs more than one hundred twenty-five days after the date of filing. (iv) The petition designates a committee of not less than three nor more than five individuals of the petitioners, who shall represent the petitioners in all matters relating to the petition. Notice of all matters or proceedings pertaining to the petition may be served on the committee, or any of them, either personally or by registered mail, or by leaving such notice at the usual place of residence of each of them. (2) No such group of electors shall assume a name or designation that is similar, in the opinion of the secretary of state, to that of an existing political party as to confuse or mislead the voters at an election. (B) A campaign committee shall be legally liable for any debts, contracts, or expenditures incurred or executed in its name. (C) Notwithstanding the definitions found in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and sections 3517.08 to 3517.991 of the Revised Code: (1) "Campaign committee" means a candidate or a combination of two or more persons authorized by a candidate under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code to receive contributions and make expenditures. (2) "Campaign treasurer" means an individual appointed by a candidate under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code. (3) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in division (H) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes any person who, at any time before or after an election, receives contributions or makes expenditures or other use of contributions, has given consent for another to receive contributions or make expenditures or other use of contributions, or appoints a campaign treasurer, for the purpose of bringing about the person's nomination or election to public office. When two persons jointly seek the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, "candidate" means the pair of candidates jointly. "Candidate" does not include candidates for election to the offices of member of a county or state central committee, presidential elector, and delegate to a national convention or conference of a political party. (4) "Continuing association" means an association, other than a campaign committee, political party, legislative campaign fund, political contributing entity, or labor organization, that is intended to be a permanent organization that has a primary purpose other than supporting or opposing specific candidates, political parties, or ballot issues, and that functions on a regular basis throughout the year. "Continuing association" includes organizations that are determined to be not organized for profit under subsection 501 and that are described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. (5) "Contribution" means a loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, payment, or transfer of funds or anything of value, including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any person other than the person to whom the services are rendered for the personal services of another person, which contribution is made, received, or used for the purpose of influencing the results of an election. Any loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, payment, or transfer of funds or of anything of value, including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, political contributing entity, or person other than the person to whom the services are rendered for the personal services of another person, that is made, received, or used by a state or county political party, other than the moneys an entity may receive under sections 3517.101, 3517.1012, and 3517.1013 of the Revised Code, shall be considered to be a "contribution" for the purpose of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code and shall be included on a statement of contributions filed under that section. "Contribution" does not include any of the following: (a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a person; (b) Ordinary home hospitality; (c) The personal expenses of a volunteer paid for by that volunteer campaign worker; (d) Any gift given to an entity pursuant to section 3517.101 of the Revised Code; (e) Any contribution as defined in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code that is made, received, or used to pay the direct costs of producing or airing an electioneering communication; (f) Any gift given to a state or county political party for the party's restricted fund under division (A)(2) of section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code; (g) Any gift given to a state political party for deposit in a Levin account pursuant to section 3517.1013 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "Levin account" has the same meaning as in that section. (h) Any donation given to a transition fund under section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. (6) "Expenditure" means the disbursement or use of a contribution for the purpose of influencing the results of an election or of making a charitable donation under division (G) of section 3517.08 of the Revised Code. Any disbursement or use of a contribution by a state or county political party is an expenditure and shall be considered either to be made for the purpose of influencing the results of an election or to be made as a charitable donation under division (G) of section 3517.08 of the Revised Code and shall be reported on a statement of expenditures filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. During the thirty days preceding a primary or general election, any disbursement to pay the direct costs of producing or airing a broadcast, cable, or satellite communication that refers to a clearly identified candidate shall be considered to be made for the purpose of influencing the results of that election and shall be reported as an expenditure or as an independent expenditure under section 3517.10 or 3517.105 of the Revised Code, as applicable, except that the information required to be reported regarding contributors for those expenditures or independent expenditures shall be the same as the information required to be reported under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "broadcast, cable, or satellite communication" and "refers to a clearly identified candidate" have the same meanings as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (7) "Personal expenses" includes, but is not limited to, ordinary expenses for accommodations, clothing, food, personal motor vehicle or airplane, and home telephone. (8) "Political action committee" means a combination of two or more persons, the primary or major purpose of which is to support or oppose any candidate, political party, or issue, or to influence the result of any election through express advocacy, and that is not a political party, a campaign committee, a political contributing entity, or a legislative campaign fund. "Political action committee" does not include either of the following: (a) A continuing association that makes disbursements for the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications and that does not engage in express advocacy; (b) A political club that is formed primarily for social purposes and that consists of one hundred members or less, has officers and periodic meetings, has less than two thousand five hundred dollars in its treasury at all times, and makes an aggregate total contribution of one thousand dollars or less per calendar year. (9) "Public office" means any state, county, municipal, township, or district office, except an office of a political party, that is filled by an election and the offices of United States senator and representative. (10) "Anything of value" has the same meaning as in section 1.03 of the Revised Code. (11) "Beneficiary of a campaign fund" means a candidate, a public official or employee for whose benefit a campaign fund exists, and any other person who has ever been a candidate or public official or employee and for whose benefit a campaign fund exists. (12) "Campaign fund" means money or other property, including contributions. (13) "Public official or employee" has the same meaning as in section 102.01 of the Revised Code. (14) "Caucus" means all of the members of the house of representatives or all of the members of the senate of the general assembly who are members of the same political party. (15) "Legislative campaign fund" means a fund that is established as an auxiliary of a state political party and associated with one of the houses of the general assembly. (16) "In-kind contribution" means anything of value other than money that is used to influence the results of an election or is transferred to or used in support of or in opposition to a candidate, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, political action committee, or political contributing entity and that is made with the consent of, in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of the benefited candidate, committee, fund, party, or entity. The financing of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or part, of any broadcast or of any written, graphic, or other form of campaign materials prepared by the candidate, the candidate's campaign committee, or their authorized agents is an in-kind contribution to the candidate and an expenditure by the candidate. (17) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure by a person advocating the election or defeat of an identified candidate or candidates, that is not made with the consent of, in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate or candidates or of the campaign committee or agent of the candidate or candidates. As used in division (C)(17) of this section: (a) "Person" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated business organization or association, political action committee, political contributing entity, separate segregated fund, association, or other organization or group of persons, but not a labor organization or a corporation unless the labor organization or corporation is a political contributing entity. (b) "Advocating" means any communication containing a message advocating election or defeat. (c) "Identified candidate" means that the name of the candidate appears, a photograph or drawing of the candidate appears, or the identity of the candidate is otherwise apparent by unambiguous reference. (d) "Made in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or the campaign committee or agent of the candidate" means made pursuant to any arrangement, coordination, or direction by the candidate, the candidate's campaign committee, or the candidate's agent prior to the publication, distribution, display, or broadcast of the communication. An expenditure is presumed to be so made when it is any of the following: (i) Based on information about the candidate's plans, projects, or needs provided to the person making the expenditure by the candidate, or by the candidate's campaign committee or agent, with a view toward having an expenditure made; (ii) Made by or through any person who is, or has been, authorized to raise or expend funds, who is, or has been, an officer of the candidate's campaign committee, or who is, or has been, receiving any form of compensation or reimbursement from the candidate or the candidate's campaign committee or agent; (iii) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code, made by a political party in support of a candidate, unless the expenditure is made by a political party to conduct voter registration or voter education efforts. (e) "Agent" means any person who has actual oral or written authority, either express or implied, to make or to authorize the making of expenditures on behalf of a candidate, or means any person who has been placed in a position with the candidate's campaign committee or organization such that it would reasonably appear that in the ordinary course of campaign-related activities the person may authorize expenditures. (18) "Labor organization" means a labor union; an employee organization; a federation of labor unions, groups, locals, or other employee organizations; an auxiliary of a labor union, employee organization, or federation of labor unions, groups, locals, or other employee organizations; or any other bona fide organization in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment. (19) "Separate segregated fund" means a separate segregated fund established pursuant to the Federal Election Campaign Act. (20) "Federal Election Campaign Act" means the "Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971," 86 Stat. 11, 2 U.S.C.A. 431, et seq., as amended. (21) "Restricted fund" means the fund a state or county political party must establish under division (A)(1) of section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code. (22) "Electioneering communication" has the same meaning as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (23) "Express advocacy" means a communication that contains express words advocating the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate or that contains express words advocating the adoption or defeat of a question or issue, as determined by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. (24) "Political committee" has the same meaning as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (25) "Political contributing entity" means any entity, including a corporation or labor organization, that may lawfully make contributions and expenditures and that is not an individual or a political action committee, continuing association, campaign committee, political party, legislative campaign fund, designated state campaign committee, or state candidate fund. For purposes of this division, "lawfully" means not prohibited by any section of the Revised Code, or authorized by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. (26) "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.012. (A)(1) When a party formation petition meeting the requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code declaring the intention to organize a political party is filed with the secretary of state, the new party comes into legal existence on the date of filing and is entitled to nominate party candidates to appear on the ballot at the general election held in even-numbered years that occurs more than one hundred twenty-five days after the date of filing. (2)(a) Upon receiving a party formation petition filed under division (A)(1) of this section, the secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each board of elections the separate petition papers that purport to contain signatures of electors of that board's county. (b) Not later than the one hundred eighteenth day before the day of the general election, each board shall examine and determine the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition papers and shall return them to the secretary of state, together with the board's certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of the signatures on the petition. (c) Any qualified elector may file a written protest against the petition with the secretary of state not later than the one hundred fourteenth day before the day of the general election. Any such protest shall be resolved in the manner specified under section 3501.39 of the Revised Code. (d) Not later than the ninety-fifth day before the day of the general election, the secretary of state shall determine whether the party formation petition is sufficient and shall notify the committee designated in the petition of that determination. (B)(1) Not later than one hundred ten days before the day of that general election and not earlier than the day the applicable party formation petition is filed, each candidate or pair of joint candidates wishing to appear on the ballot at the general election as the nominee or nominees of the party that filed the party formation petition shall file a nominating petition, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, that includes the name of the political party that submitted the party formation petition. Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 3505.03, 3505.08, 3506.11, and 3513.31, 3513.311, and 3513.312 of the Revised Code, the provisions of the Revised Code concerning independent candidates who file nominating petitions apply to candidates who file nominating petitions under this section. (2)(a) If the candidacy is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, the nominating petition, including a petition for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by at least fifty qualified electors who have not voted as a member of a different political party at any party primary election within the current year or the immediately preceding two calendar years. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if If the candidacy is to be submitted only to electors within a district, political subdivision, or portion thereof, the nominating petition shall be signed by not less than five qualified electors who have not voted as a member of a different political party at any party primary election within the current year or the immediately preceding two calendar years. (3)(a) Each board of elections that is responsible to verify signatures on the nominating petition shall examine and determine the sufficiency of those signatures not later than the one hundred fifth day before the day of the general election and shall be resolved as specified in that section. (b) Written protests against the petition may be filed in the manner specified under section 3513.263 of the Revised Code not later than the one hundredth day before the general election and shall be resolved as specified in that section. (c) Not later than the ninety-fifth day before the day of the general election, the secretary of state or the board of elections, as applicable, shall determine whether the nominating petition is sufficient and shall notify the candidate and the committee designated in the party formation petition of that determination. (C)(1) After being notified that the political party has submitted a sufficient party formation petition under division (A) of this section, the committee designated in a party formation petition shall, not later than the seventy-fifth day before the day of the general election, certify to the secretary of state a slate of candidates consisting of candidates or joint candidates who submitted sufficient nominating petitions under division (B) of this section. The slate certifying the candidates shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by all of the individuals of the committee designated in the party formation petition. In no event shall the slate of candidates include more than one candidate for any public office or more than one set of joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. The names of the candidates or joint candidates so certified shall appear on the ballot at the general election as that party's nominees for those offices. For purposes of this division, "joint candidates" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor. (2) If a candidate's nominating petition is insufficient or if the committee does not certify the candidate's name under division (C)(1) of this section, the candidate shall not appear on the ballot in the general election. (3) If a party formation petition is insufficient, no candidate shall appear on the ballot in the general election as that political party's nominee, regardless of whether any candidate's nominating petition is sufficient. Sec. 3517.03. The controlling committees of each major political party or organization shall be a state central committee consisting of two members, one a man and one a woman, representing either each congressional district in the state or each senatorial district in the state, as the outgoing committee determines; a county central committee consisting of one member from each election precinct in the county, or of one member from each ward in each city and from each township in the county, as the outgoing committee determines; and such district, city, township, or other committees as the rules of the party provide. All the members of such committees shall be members of the party and shall be elected for terms of either two or four years, as determined by party rules, by direct vote at the primary held in an even-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.02 of the Revised Code, candidates for election as state central committee members shall be elected at primaries in the same manner as provided in sections 3513.01 to 3513.32 of the Revised Code for the nomination of candidates for partisan office in a county. Candidates for election as members of the county central committee shall be elected at primaries in the same manner as provided in those sections for the nomination of candidates for county partisan offices, except as otherwise provided in sections 3513.051 and 3517.02 of the Revised Code. Each major party controlling committee shall elect an executive committee that shall have the powers granted to it by the party controlling committee, and provided to it by law. When a judicial, senatorial, or congressional district is comprised of more than one county, the chairperson and secretary of the county central committee from each county in that district shall constitute the judicial, senatorial, or congressional committee of the district. When a judicial, senatorial, or congressional district is included within a county, the county central committee shall constitute the judicial, senatorial, or congressional committee of the district. A minor political party may elect controlling committees at a primary election in the even-numbered year by filing a plan for party organization with the secretary of state on or before the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election. The plan shall specify which offices are to be elected and provide the procedure for qualification of candidates for those offices. Candidates to be elected pursuant to the plan shall be designated and qualified on or before the ninetieth day before the day of the election. Such parties may, in lieu of electing a controlling committee or other officials, choose such committee or other officials in accordance with party rules. Each such party shall file the names and addresses of members of its controlling committee and party officers with the secretary of state. Section 2. That existing sections 111.27, 3501.01, 3501.06, 3501.23, 3505.03, 3505.04, 3509.03, 3509.04, 3511.02, 3511.05, 3513.01, 3513.02, 3513.04, 3513.05, 3513.052, 3513.07, 3513.13, 3513.14, 3513.19, 3513.20, 3513.22, 3513.23, 3513.257, 3513.261, 3513.262, 3513.30, 3513.31, 3513.311, 3517.01, 3517.012, and 3517.03 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3513.28, 3513.301, and 3513.312 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. This act first applies to the nomination of candidates, and the election of those nominees at the following general election, beginning with the next primary election held in an even-numbered year that is held at least one hundred twenty days after the effective date of this section and first applies to vacancies for which the person last elected by the electors to the office that has become vacant was nominated in or after the next such primary election. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of sections 111.27, 3501.01, 3501.06, 3501.23, 3505.03, 3505.04, 3509.03, 3509.04, 3511.02, 3511.05, 3513.01, 3513.02, 3513.04, 3513.05, 3513.052, 3513.07, 3513.13, 3513.14, 3513.19, 3513.20, 3513.22, 3513.23, 3513.257, 3513.261, 3513.262, 3513.30, 3513.31, 3513.311, 3517.01, 3517.012, and 3517.03 of the Revised Code as amended by this act, and notwithstanding the repeal of sections 3513.301 and 3513.312 of the Revised Code, if after the effective date of this section but before the first primary election to which this act applies a vacancy occurs in the office of representative to congress or in the representation of this state in the senate of the United States, the provisions of sections 3513.301 and 3513.312 of the Revised Code that were in effect immediately before the effective date of this section apply to each such occurrence until the vacancy has been filled.